The strategic effect of geography on the relations among nations has long been a matter of serious study and speculation. Halford J. Mackinder s Democratic 1deals and Reality, which appeared just after World War I, is certainly a landmark analysis of the subject. Mackinder made famous the "heartland" and "rimland" views of strategic geography that influenced a generation of strategic thinkers. By 1939, however, a cloud had fallen over Mackinder's work because the Nazis had successfully applied certain of his principles in their march of conquest. This tainted Mackinder's reputation, and Demo- cratic Ideals and Reality faded from the curricula of military and civilian colleges in the West. In 1942 Allied strategic planners once again recognized the value of Mackinder's work, which they used in engineering the defeat of Germany. In the 1950s, Mackinder's influence declined as the Western strategy of containment of the Soviet Union came to dominate political and military planning. Since the end of the Cold War, however, as regional strategic concerns have replaced those of the global bipolar confrontation of the twin superpowers, the relevance of Mackinder's study is once again apparent. Democratic 1deals and Reality has, unfortunately, been out of print for more than a decade. So to meet the needs of a new generation, National Defense University has prepared the present edition, making minor editorial corrections in a few passages and adding an illuminating introduction that views that text in a contemporary light. For helping make this new edition a reality, we acknowledge a debt of gratitude to three members of the NDU family: Distinguished Visiting Professor of Law and Diplomacy Eugene Rostow, whose idea it was to revive this honored study for the modern reader; Captain Stephen Mladineo, USN, Retired, formerly Professor of Strategy at the National War College, who readied the text and wrote the present Introduction; and Miss Mary Sommerville, Senior Editor at NDU Press, who designed the book and prepared it for publication.
Credit for the idea to republish Halford J. Mackinder's Demo- cratic Ideals and Reali~ belongs to Professor Eugene V. Ros- tow. Observing that this classic volume on geopolitics had been out of print for some time, he suggested its title as appropriate for the National Defense University Defense Classic Editions. Behind this idea was the notion that Mackinder has something of value to say in this post-Cold War world. Though not the universal explanatory theory sought by some social scientists, his concept of the Heartland serves as the basis for discussion in geopolitical explanations of world events. Though his views are often contrasted with the writings of Alfred Thayer Mahan, Mackinder accepted Mahan's description of the historical preeminence of seapower. But by analogy and extension,. he credited the development of railroads in Eurasia with enabling the ruler of the Heartland to challenge that preeminence. Halford J. Mackinder was an educator, geographer, explorer, barris- ter, member of Parliament, economist, and diplomat. He was born in Gainsborough, Lincolnshire, England, in February 1861. The son of a physician, he studied sciences at Epsom College and Christ Church at Oxford. Upon completing his program at Oxford, he studied law in London, while lecturing at Christ Church and also helping lead the fledgling University extensions in Bath, Manchester, Salisbury and elsewhere, where he lectured and led tutorials on physical geography. With this experience, Mackinder's thoughts on the teaching of geog- raphy began to take shape. Elected to the Royal Geographic Society, he presented a paper to the society in January 1887 entitled "On the Scope and Methods of Geography."2 Opening with the question "What is geography?" his presentation was controversial to the audience, some of whom were army and naval officers who resented the effrontery of a young academic without experience abroad. His argument was that geography should serve as a bridge between the physical sciences and the social sciences. The impact of geographic facts on society and the effect of society on the environment were essential to the discipline. He wrote at a time when the major explora- tions of the globe had been completed. There was no land left to discover. The North and South Poles had recently been attained. At the time the physical geography being taught was geology, and the teaching of political geography required little more than recitation of demographic facts. While the creation of the discipline of geography in England cannot be credited entirely to Mackinder, his controversial presentation to the Royal Geographic Society and the subsequent discus- sion of it did have an impact and led to the creation of geography readerships at both Oxford and Cambridge with support from the So- ciety. In 1904 Mackinder presented a paper to the Society entitled, "The Geographical Pivot of History. ''3 In this paper he first offered the theory of the "Pivot Area," a designation for the core area of Eurasia, which was protected from the maritime powers of the day. He reasoned that the development of the potential power of this area could enable the continental power that controlled it to dominate the world. Expanding upon this concept, and with the recent experience .of World War I to draw upon, he broadened the scope of his concept of the "Pivot Area," renamed it the "Heartland," and published Democratic 1deals and Reality in 1919. Comparing his concept to the whispered warning by a slave, "You are mortal," to the returning victorious Roman Legionnaire, Mackinder issued his oft-quoted cautionary dictum:
Who rules East Europe commands the Heartland: Who rules the Heartland commands the World-Island: Who rules the World-Island commands the World.
Mackinder had in mind the crafting of a stable peace based on a balance of power designed to prevent the reemergence of Germany as the "organizer" which controlled the resources of the Heartland. Critics of Mackinder often focus on these three lines, citing their inadequacy as explanation, prediction, or prescription. Michael Howard calls them "self-evident nonsense. ''S Tarring all geopoliticians with the same brush Howard observes that they simply leave out too much. Seen in the context of historical events, conflicts between land powers and sea powers, and the technological advances taking place during World War I, Mackinder's vision was neither universal nor overly particular. His dictum was intended to be cautionary, a warning to the politicians of the day. Prescient in its anticipation of German resurgence, and of later superpower status of the Soviet Union, it was little heeded at the time. Mackinder foresaw this, noting that "Democracy refuses to think strategically unless and until compelled to do so for purposes of defense."6 His immediate warning concerned the potential resurgence of Ger- many after World War I. Recognizing that Russia could pose little danger for the near term, he nonetheless reasoned that the post-war peace required a viable buffer between the two great historical"organiz- ers" to prevent the ascendence of either to challenge the powers of the littoral nations, which he called the inner and outer crescents. He coupled this requirement with the need for an effective League of Nations. In his 1982 book, Mackinder: Geography as an Aid to Statecraft, W.H Parker carefully analyzes, categorizes, details, and largely refutes about a hundred different criticisms of the Heartland theory. He notes, "Often the critic has misinterpreted or misunderstood what Mackinder wrote; commonly, he appears to have read very little of Mackinder, or is merely repeating the allegations of others Mackinder's main critic was Professor Nicholas Spykman of Yale University. Though Spykman accepted Mackinder's description of the World Island, the Heartland, and the inner and outer crescents, his perspective was different. While Mackinder's writing focused on the "organizers" and their potential offensive use of their land power, Spykman's focus was on the democracies. These nations on the periph- ery of the World Island had a defensive view, to be fully articulated only later, as the theory of containment by George Kennan.
Spykman renamed the inner crescent the Rimland and argued based on his analysis of power politics that Mackinder's slogan should be recast as "Who controls the rimland rules Eurasia; who rules Eurasia controls the destinies of the world.' ,7 Spykman differed in his interpreta- tion of geopolitics from Mackinder, but built on Mackinder's overall concept and vocabulary to define his view. If for no other reason, Mackinder's theory is important because it has defined the vocabulary of the geopolitical discussion. Without Mackinder's construct there would have been no framework for Spykman and others to build upon. Some have criticized Mackinder's imprecise definition of the Heart- land. At times he included Central Europe, at other times he excluded it. In his 1943 article "The Round World and the Winning of the Peace, ''s he rejected the need to be too precise, contending that the definition of the Heartland arose from various geographic conditions which were not coincident. He went on to argue that exact boundaries were not necessary to describe a strategic concept, and that his general definitions were adequate. Another set of criticisms deals with his treatment of the United States. Some argue that North America should be considered as a separate heartland. Mackinder recognized the potential of the North American democracies, but would not have applied the term heartland to them, because of their maritime nature. He did speculate that central Africa could develop into a second heartland, with its attributes of self- containment and remoteness from the sea, but the concept does not apply very well to the maritime Americas. He is similarly accused of ignoring the vast resources and potential of North America. Remembering that Mackinder's writing was caution- ary, he was not concerned about the power of the North American democracies, considering them part of the outer crescent. He was warn- ing of the "'organizers", those who would use the power potential of the Heartland to dominate the world. Some critics accuse Mackinder of exaggerating the power potential of the Heartland. Others contend that his theory ignores technology, that it is superseded by the advent of air power. Other critics dispute his theory on philosophical, ethical, political, or ideological grounds. Still others contend that the entire discipline of geopolitics is suspect.
Geopolitics was somewhat discredited by the development of Ger- man Geopolitik during the interwar years. Karl Haushofer, a German geographer and chauvinist, distorted the ideas of Mackinder and others to justify German expansion. Haushofer, along with many other Ger- mans, believed that Germany should not have lost World War I, and that the postwar treatment of Germany was unjust. Building on the concept of the Heartland, Haushofer argued the German need for lebens- raum. Along with other pseudoscientific studies, such as those proving the superiority of the Aryan race, Haushofer's use of geopolitics for propaganda purposes influenced the expansionist goals of the Nazis. Some critics accuse Mackinder of determinism. They take his warn- ings of what could happen based on geographic potential to be predic- tions of what must happen. But such critics misunderstand Mackinder, who argued that man, not geography, controls the future. Because of geographic conditions, the people who controlled the Heartland would have an enormous advantage. In 1943 Mackinder was asked to update his theory in light of the developments which led to World War II. He responded with a defense of his early thesis in his article, "The Round World and the Winning of the Peace. ''9 Saying that the concept of the Heartland was "more valid and useful today" than when he first wrote about it, he sketched a geographic view of an alliance of a capable Heartland power, the Soviet Union, with the oceanic powers who possessed "a bridgehead in France, a moated aerodrome in Britain, and a reserve of trained manpower, agriculture and industries in the eastern United States and Canada." This idea formed the basis for his view of balance of power. Though his primary concern continued to be Germany, he recognized the possibility that other states had the potential to establish hegemony over the Heartland. Dismissing Russia as an immediate threat in the wake of the revolution, he did not rule it out in the long term. He even postulated ,China as a potential ultimate "organizer" of the Heartland. Geopolitical theory has had many years to develop since Democratic Ideals and Reality was first published. Spykman was one early theorist. Among other geopoliticians was Alexander P. De Seversky, a principal advocate of an Arctic centered view of the world. His Victory Through Air Power and Air Power: Key to Survival expressed the view that land power and sea power had become subordinate to air power.
Geographer Saul B. Cohen, in Geography and Politics in a World Divided proposed a new framework dividing the globe into geostrategic regions corresponding to the spheres of influence of the major world powers, and geopolitical regions that include independent regions like South Asia, and what he called Shatterbelts, large, strategically located regions occupied by a number of conflicting states and caught between the opposing interests of the adjoining great powers. Notwithstanding the evolution of geopolitical theory, the cautionary value of Democratic Ideals and Reality is undiminished after 77 years. The potential for the return of autocratic rule to Mackinder's Heartland remains. The end of the Cold War has not brought an end to ambition. Democratic ideals notwithstanding, the reality of a resurgent autocratic power seeking hegemony over central Eurasia remains a possibility. Mackinder does not predict it, he only cautions awareness of the threat.
This book, whatever its value, is the outcome of more than the merely feverous thought of war time; the ideas upon which it is based were published in outline a good dozen years ago. In 1904, in a paper on "The Geographical Pivot of History," read before the Royal Geographical Society, I sketched the World-Island and the Heartland; and in 1905 1 wrote in the National Review on the subject of "Man Power as a Measure of National and Imperial Strength," an article which I believe first gave vogue to the term Manpower. In that term is implicit not only the idea of fighting strength but also that of productivity, rather than wealth, as the focus of economic reasoning. If I now venture to write on these themes at somewhat greater length, it is because I feel that the war has established, and not shaken, my former points of view.
Our memories are still full of the vivid detail of an all-absorbing twarfare; there is, as it were, a screen between us and the things which happened earlier even in our lives. But the time has at last come to take larger views, and we must begin to think of our long war as of a single great event, a cataract in the stream of history. The last four years have been momentous, because they have been the outcome of one century and the prelude to another. Tension between the nations had slowly accumulated, and, in the language of diplomacy there has now been a d~tente. The temptation of the moment is to believe that unceasing peace will ensue merely because tired men are determined that there shall be no more war. But international tension will accumulate again, though slowly at first; there was a. generation of peace after Waterloo. Who among the diplomats round the Congress table at Vienna in 1814 foresaw that Prussia would become a menace to the world? Is it possible for us so to grade the stream bed of future history as that there shall be no more cataracts? This, and no smaller, is the task before us if we would have posterity think less meanly of our wisdom than we think of that of thc diplomats of Vienna. The great wars of history--we have had a world war about every hundred years for the last four centuries---are the outcome, direct or indirect, of the unequal growth of nations, and that unequal growth is not wholly due to the greater genius and energy of some nations as compared with others; in large measure it is the result of the uneven distribution of fertility and strategical opportunity upon the face of the globe. In other words, there is in nature no such thing as equality of opportunity for the nations. Unless I wholly misread the facts of geography, I would go further, and say that the grouping of lands and seas, and of fertility and natural pathways, is such as to lend itself to the growth of empires, and in the end of a single world-empire. If we are to realize our ideal of a League of Nations which shall prevent war in the future, we must recognize these geographical realities and take steps to counter their influence. Last century, under the spell of the Darwinian theory, men came to think that those forms of organization. should survive which adapted themselves best to their natural environ- ment. To-day we realize, as we emerge from our fiery trial, that human victory consists in our rising superior to such mere fatalism. Civilization is based on the organization of society so that we may render service to one another, and the higher the civilization the more minute tends to be the division of labor and the more complex the organization.
A great and advanced society has, in consequence, a powerful momentum; without destroying the society itself you cannot suddenly check or divert its course. Thus it happcns that years before- hand detached observers are able to predict a coming clash of societies which are following convergent paths in their development. The histo- rian commonly prefaces his narrative of war with an account of the blindness of men who refused to see the writing on the wall, but the fact is, that, like every other Going Concern, a national society can be shaped to a desired career while it is young, but when it is old its character is fixed and it is incapable of any great change in its mode of existence. To-day all the nations of the world are about to start afresh; is it within the reach of human forethought so to set their courses as that, notwithstanding geographical temptation, they shall not clash in the days of our grandchildren? In our anxiety to repudiate the ideas historically associated with the balance of power is there not perhaps some danger that we should allow merely juridical conceptions to rule our thoughts in regard to the League of Nations? It is our ideal that Justice should be done between nations, whether they be great or small, precisely as it is our ideal that there should be justice between men, whatever the difference of their positions in society. To maintain justice as between individual men the power of the state is invoked, and we now recognize, after the failure of international law to avert the Great War, that there must be some power or, as the lawyers say, some sanction for the maintenance of justice as between nation and nation. But the power which is neces- sary for the rule of law among citizens passes easily into tyranny. Can we establish such a world power as shall suffice to keep the law between great and small states, and yet shall not grow into a world-tyranny? There are two roads to such tyranny, the one the conquest of all other nations by one nation, the other the perversion of the very international power itself which may be set up to coerce the lawless nation. In our great replanning of human society we must recognize that the skill and opportunity of the robber are prior facts to the law of robbery. In other words, we must envisage our vast problem as business men dealing with realities of growth and opportunity, and not merely as lawyers defining rights and remedies. My endeavor, in the following pages, will be to measure the relative significance of the great features of our globe as tested by the events of history, including the history of the last four years, and then to consider how we may best adjust our ideals of freedom to these lasting realities of our earthly home. But first we must recognize certain tenden- cies of human nature as exhibited in all forms of political organization.
In the year 1789 the lucid French people, in its brain-town of Paris, saw visions, generous visions---Liberty, Equality, Fraternity. But presently French idealism lost its hold on reality, and chifted into the grip of fate, in the person of Napoleon. With his military efficiency Napoleon restored order, but in doing so organized a French power the very law of whose being was a denial of liberty. The story of the great French Revolution and Empire has influenced all subsequent political thought; it has seemed a tragedy in the old Greek sense of a disaster predestined in the very character of revolutionary idealism. When, therefore, in 1848, the peoples of Europe were again in a vision-seeing mood, their idealism was of a more complex nature. The principle of Nationality was added to that of Liberty, in the hope that liberty might be secured against the overreaching organizer by the independent spirit of nations. Unfortunately, in that year of revolutions, the good ship Idealism again dragged her anchor, and by and by was swept away by fate, in the person of Bismarck. With his Prussian efficiency Bismarck perverted the new ideal of German nationality, just as Napoleon had perverted the simpler French ideals of liberty and equality. The tragedy of national idealism, which we have just seen consummated, was not, however, predestined in the disorder of liberty, but in the materialism, commonly known as Kultur, of the organizer.
The French tragedy was the simple tragedy of the breakdown of ideal- ism; but the German tragedy has, in truth, been the tragedy of the substituted realism. In 1917 the democratic nations of the whole earth thought they had seen a great harbor light when the Russian Czardom fell and the American Republic came into the war. For the time being, at any rate, the Russian Revolution has gone the common revolutionary way, but we still put our hope in universal democracy. To the eighteenth-century ideal of liberty, and the nineteenth-century ideal of nationality, we have added our twentieth-century ideal of the League of Nations. If a third tragedy were to ensue, it would be on a vast scale, for democratic ideals are to-day the working creed of the greater part of humanity. The Germans, with their Real-Politik, their politics of reality-- something other than merely practical politics regard that disaster as being sooner or later inevitable. The war lord and the Prussian military caste may have been fighting for the mere maintenance of their power, but large and intelligent sections of German society have acted under the persuasion of a political philosophy which was none the less sin- cerely held because we believed it to be wrong. In this war German anticipations have proved wrong in many regards, but that has been because we have made them so by a few wise principles of government, and by strenuous effort, notwithstanding our mistakes in policy. Our hardest test has yet to come. What degree of international reconstruction is necessary if the world is long to remain a safe place for democracies? And in regard to the internal structure of those democracies, what conditions must be satisfied if we are to succeed in harnessing to the heavy plow of social reconst1uction the ideals which have inspired heroism in this war? There can be no more momentous questions. Shall we succeed in soberly marrying our new idealism to reality? Idealists are the salt of the earth; without them to move us, society would soon stagnate and civilization fade. Idealism has, however, been associated with two very different phases of temper. The older ideal- isms, such as Buddhism, Stoicism, and Medieval Christianity, were based on self-denial; the Franciscan Friars vowed themselves to chas- tity, poverty, and service. But modem democratic idealism, the idealism of the American and French Revolutions, is based on self-realization.
Its aim is that every human being shall live a full and self-respecting life. According to the preamble of the American Declaration of Indepen- dence, all men are created equal and endowed with the rights of liberty and the pursuit of happiness. These two tendencies of idealism have corresponded historically with two developments of reality. In older times the power of nature over man was still great. Hard reality put limits to his ambitions. In other words, the world as a whole was poor, and resignation was the only general road to happiness. The few could, no doubt, obtain some scope in life, but only at the cost of the serfdom of the many. Even the so-called Democracy of Athens and the Platonic Utopia were based on domestic and industrial slavery. But the modern world is rich. In no small measure man now controls the forces of nature, and whole classes, formerly resigned to their fate, have become imbued with the idea that with a fairer division of wealth there should be a nearer approach to equality of opportunity. This modern reality of human control over nature, apart from which democratic ideals would be futile, is not wholly due to the advance of scientific knowledge and invention. The greater control which man now wields is conditional, and not absolute like the control of nature over man by famine and pestilence. Human riches and comparative security are based to-day on the division and co-ordination of labor, and on the constant repair of the complicated plant which has replaced the simple tools of primitive society. In other words, the output of modern wealth is conditional on the maintenance of our social organiza- tion and capital. Society is a Going Concern, and no small part of our well-being may be compared with the intangible "goodwill" of a business. The owner of a business depends on the habits of his customers no less than on the regular running of the machinery in his factory; both must be kept in repair, and when in repair they have the value of the Going Concern; but should the business stop, they have merely a break-up value--the machinery becomes so much scrap metal, and the goodwill is reduced to the book debts. Society reposes on the fact that man is a creature of habit. By interlocking the various habits of many men, society obtains a structure which may be compared with that of a running machine. Mrs. Bouncer was able to form a simple society for the occupation of a room, because Box slept by night and Cox by day, but her society was dislocated when one of her lodgers took a holiday, and for the nonce changed his habit. Let anyone try to realize what would happen to himself if all those on whom he depends the postmen, railwaymen, butchers, bakers, printers, and very many others were suddenly to vary their settled routines; he will then begin to appreciate in how great a degree the power of modern man over nature is due to the fact that society is a Going Concern, or, in the language of the engineer, has momentum. Stop the running long enough to throw men's habits out of gear with one another, and society would quickly run down to the simple reality of control by nature. Vast numbers would die in consequence. Productive power, in short, is a far more important element of reality in relation to modem civilization than is accumulated wealth. The total visible wealth of a civilized country, notwithstanding the antiquity of some of its treasures, is generally estimated as equal to the output of not more than seven or eight years. The significance of this statement does not lie in its precise accuracy, but in the rapid growth of its practical meaning for modem men, owing to their dependence on a machinery of production, mechanical and social, which in the past four or five generations has become increasingly delicate and complicated. For every advance in the application of science there has been a corres- ponding change in social organization. It was by no mere coincidence that Adam Smith was discussing the division of labor when James Watt was inventing the steam engine. Nor, in our own time, is it by blind coincidence that beside the invention of the internal combustion engine---the key to the motor-car, submarine, and aeroplane--must he placed an unparalleled extension of the credit system. Lubrication of metal machinery depends on the habits of living men. The assumption of some scientific enthusiasts that the study of the humane arts has ceased to be important will not bear examination; the management of men, high and low, is more difficult and more important under the conditions of modem reality than it ever was. We describe the managers of the social machine as organizers, but under that general term are commonly included two distinct categories. In the first place, we have administrators, who are not strictly organizers at all---begetters, that is to say, of new organs in an organism. It is the function of the administrator to keep the running social machine in repair and to see to its lubrication. When men die, or for reasons of ill-health or old age retire, it is his duty to fill the vacant places with men suitably trained beforehand. A foreman of works is essentially an administrator. A judge administers the law, except in so far as in fact, though not in theory, he may make it. In the work of the administrator, pure and simple, there is no idea of progress. Given a certain organiza- tion, efficiency is his ideal---perfect smoothness of working. His charac- teristic disease is called "Red Tape." A complicated society, well administered, tends in fact to a Chinese stagnation by the very strength of its momentum. 
The goodwill of a long-established and well-managed business may often be sold for a large sum in the market. Perhaps the most striking illustration of social momentum is to be seen in the immobility of the markets themselves. Every seller wishes to go where buyers are in the habit of congregating in order that he may be sure of a purchaser for his wares. On the other hand, every buyer goes, if he can, to the place where sellers are wont to assemble in order that he may buy cheaply as a result of their competition. The authorities have often tried in vain to decentralize the markets of London. In order to appreciate the other type of organizer, the creator of social mechanism, let us again consider for a moment the common course of revolutions. A Voltaire criticizes the running concern known as French Government; a Rousseau paints the ideal of a happier society; the authors of the great Encyclopedic prove that the material bases for such a society exist. Presently the new ideas take possession of some well-meaning enthusiasts--inexperienced, however, in the difficult art of changing the habits of average mankind. They seize an opportunity for altering the structure of French society. Incidentally, but unfortu- nately, they slow down its running. Stoppage of work, actual breakage of the implements of production and government, removal of practiced administrators, and substitution of misfitting amateurs combine to re- duce the rate of production of the necessaries of life, with the result that prices rise, and confidence and credit fall. The revolutionary leaders are, no doubt, willing enough to be poor for a time in order to realize their ideals, but the hungry millions rise up around them. To gain time the millions are led to suspect that the shortage is due to some interfer- ence of the deposed powers, and the Terror inevitably follows. 
At last men become fatalists, and, abandoning ideals, seek some organizer who shall restore efficiency. The necessity is reinforced by the fact that foreign enemies are invading the national territory, and that less production and relaxed discipline have reduced the defensive power of the state. But the organizer needed for the task of reconstruction is no mere administrator; he must be able to design and make, and not merely to repair and lubricate social machinery. So Camot, who "orga- nizes victory," and Napoleon with his Code Civil, win eternal fame by creative effort. The possibility of organization in the constructive sense depends on discipline. Running society is constituted by the myriad interlocking of the different habits of many men; if the running social structure is to be altered, even in some relatively small respect, a great number of men and women must simultaneously change various of their habits in complementary ways. It was impossible to introduce daylight saving except by an edict of government, for any partial adherence to the change of hour would have thrown society into confusion. The achieve- ment.of daylight saving was, therefore, dependent on social discipline, which is thus seen to consist not in the habits of men but in the power of simultaneous and correlated change of those habits. In an ordered state the sense of discipline becomes innate, and the police are but rarely called upon to enforce it. In other words, social discipline, or the alteration of habit at will or command, itself becomes a habit. Military discipline, in so far as it consists of single acts at the word of command, is of a simpler order, but the professional soldier knows well the difference between habitual discipline and even the most intelligent fighting by quick-trained men. In times of disorder the interlocking of productive habits breaks down step by step, and society as a whole becomes progressively poor, though robbers of one kind or another may for a while enrich themselves. Even more serious, however, is the failure of the habit of discipline, for that implies the loss of the power of recuperation. Con- sider to what a pass Russia was brought by a year of cumulative revolutions; her condition was like that terrible state of paralysis when the mind still sees and directs, but the nerves fail to elicit any response from the muscles. A nation does not die when so smitten, but the whole mechanism of its society must be reconstituted, and that quickly, if the men and women who survive its impoverishment are not to forget the habits and lose the aptitudes on which their civilization depends. History shows no remedy but force upon which to found a fresh nucleus of discipline in such circumstances; but the organizer who rests upon force tends inevitably to treat the recovery of mere efficiency as his end. Idealism does not flourish under his rule. It was because history speaks plainly in this regard, that so many of the idealists of the last two generations have been internationalist; the military recovery of discipline is commonly achieved either by conquest from another na- tional base or incidentally to a successful national resistance to for- eign invasion. The great organizer is the great realist. Not that he lacks imagina- tion---very far from that; but his imagination turns to "ways and means," and not elusive ends. His is the mind of Martha and not of Mary. If he be a captain of industry the counters of his thought are labor and capital; if he be a general of armies they are units and supplies. His organizing is aimed at intermediate ends money if he be an industrial, and victory if he be a soldier. But money and victory are merely the keys to ulterior ends, and those ulterior ends remain elusive for him throughout. He dies still making money, or, if he be a victorious soldier, weeps like Alexander because there are no more worlds to conquer. His one care is that the business or the army which he has organized shall be efficiently administered; he is hard on his administra- tors. Above all, he values the habit of discipline; his machine must answer promptly to the lever. The organizer inevitably comes to look upon men as his tools. His is the inverse of the mind of the idealist, for he would move men in brigades and must therefore have regard to material limitations, whereas the idealist appeals to the soul in each of us, and souls are winged and can soar.
It does not follow that the organizer is careless of the well- being of the society beneath him; on the contrary, he regards that society as so much man-power to be maintained in efficient condition. This is true whether he be militarist or capitalist, provided that he be farsighted. In the sphere of politics the organizer views men as existing for the state---for the Leviathan of the Stuart philosopher Hobbes. But the democratic idealist barely tolerates the state as a necessary evil, for it limits freedom. In the established democracies of the West, the ideals of freedom have been transmuted into the prejudices of the average citizen, and it is on these "habits of thought" that the security of our freedom depends, rather than on the passing ecstasies of idealism. For a thousand years such prejudices took root under the insular protection of Britain; they are the outcome of continuous experiment, and must be treated at least with respect, unless we are prepared to think of our forefathers as fools. One of these prejudices is that it is unwise to take an expert as minister of state. In the present time of war, when freedom even in a democracy must yield to efficiency, there are those who would have us say that the experts whom we have for the time being installed in some of the high offices should be succeeded henceforth by experts, and that our prejudice is antiquated. None the less even in war time Britain has returned to a Civilian Minister for War! The fact is, of course, that the inefficiencies of the normally working British Constitution are merely the obverse of the truth that democracy is incompatible with the organization necessary for war against autocracies. When the present Chilean Minister first came to England he was entertained by some members of the House of Commons. Referring to the Mother of Parlia- ments, as seen from the far Pacific, and to the chronic grumbling in regard to Parliamentary government which he found on his arrival in London, he exclaimed, "You forget that one of the chief functions of Parliaments is to prevent things being done!" The thought of the organizer is essentially strategical, whereas that of the true democrat is ethical. The organizer is thinking how to use men; but the democrat is thinking of the rights of men, which rights are so many rocks in the way of the organizer. Undoubtedly the orga- nizer must be a master, for, given the waywardness of human nature and the inveteracy of habit, he would make little progress otherwise. But he is a bad supreme master, because of his "ways and means" mind. The Nemesis of democratic idealism, if it break from the bonds of reality, is the supreme rule of the organizer and of blind efficiency. The organizer begins innocently enough; his executive mind revolts from the disorder, and above all from the indiscipline around him. Soldierly efficiency undoubtedly saved Revolutionary France. But such is the impetus of the Going Concern, that it sweeps forward cven its own creator. To improve the efficiency of his man-power he must in the end seek to control all its activities---working and thinking, no less than fighting. He is in supreme command, and inefficiency is pain to him. Therefore Napoleon added to his Grand Army and his Code Civil, also his Concordat with the Papacy, whereby the priest was to become his servant. He might have enjoyed lasting peace after the Treaty of Amiens, but must needs continue to prepare war. Finally he was im- pelled to his Moscow, just as a great money-maker will overreach himself and end in bankruptcy. Bismarck was the Napoleon of the Prussians, their man of blood and iron, yet he differed from his French prototype in certain regards which, for our present purpose, are worth attention. His end was unlike the end of Napoleon. There was no banishment to Elba after a Moscow, no imprisonment in St. Helena after a Waterloo. True that, after thirty years at the helm, the old pilot was dropped in 1890 by a new captain with a mind to piracy, but it was because of his caution and not because of vaulting ambition. Both Napoleon and Bismarck had supreme minds of the "ways and means" order, but there was something more in Bismarck. He was not merely the great businessman, which is Emer- son's description of Napoleon. No statesman ever adjusted war to policy with a nicer judgment than Bismarck.
He fought three short and successful campaigns, and made three treaties of peace, from each of which ensued a harvest of advantage to Prussia. Yet what different treaties they were! After the War of 1864 against Denmark, Bismarck took Schleswig and Holstein, with the idea, beyond question, of a Kiel Canal. After the War of 1866 against Austria he refused to take Bohe- mia, and thereby so offended his king that they were not fully reconciled until after the victories of 1870. There can be no doubt that in this clemency Bismarck foresaw a time when Prussia might need the alliance of Austria. In 1871, after Sedan and the Siege of Paris, Bismarck yielded to the pressure of the military party, and took Lorraine as well as Alsace. The great Chancellor had, in truth, what the Prussian, as a rule, lacks, an insight into the minds of other nations than his own. His methods were psychological by preference. Once he had achieved German unity under Prussia, he waged no more wars. Yet he accom- plished great thing°o for a time he ruled Europe--and his method was no mere exploitation of military prestige. At the Berlin Congress of 1878 he secured the occupation of the provinces of Bosnia and Herzego- vina for Austria, and thereby deepened the rivalry of Austria and Russia in the Balkan Peninsula. At the same Berlin Congress he privately incited France to occupy Tunis, and when France presently effected that occupation, Italy, as he foresaw, was sharply wounded. The Dual Alliance with Austria followed in 1879, and the Triple Alliance with Austria and Italy in 1881. It was as though he had sent his sheep-dog round his flock to drive his sheep to him. By subtleties of the same order he antagonized France and Britain, and also Britain and Russia. So, too, did he deal in his domestic policy. In 1886 he ceased from struggling with the Vatican, and brought over the Catholic party to his support, thereby neutralizing the socialist tendency in the industrial but Catholic province of the Rhineland, and the particularist tendency in the Catholic kingdom of Bavaria in the south.
The true parallel is to be drawn not between Napoleon and Bismarck, but between Napoleon and the entire Prussian ruling caste. The end of that caste, which we are now witnessing, is like the end of Napoleon; the blindly organizing man goes to his Moscow, and the blindly organiz- ing state to its Armageddon. Kultur is the name given to the philosophy and education which imbued a whole race with the "ways and means" mind. The French are an artistic, and therefore an idealistic people; Napoleon prostituted their idealism with the glory of his genius. Bis- marck, on the other hand, was the child of materialistic Kultur, but, greater than the average of his race, he could reckon also with spiri- tual forces. Kultur had its origin not in the victories of Frederick the Great, but in the defeat of Jena. The rule of Frederick in the eighteenth century was a personal rule like that of Napoleon, whereas the Prussia of the nineteenth century, behind whatever other pretense, was governed by an oligarchy of intellectual "experts"--staff officers, bureaucrats, pro- fessors. Frederick, sole organizer, raised only administrators, with the result that when he died he left Prussia a mere mechanism, to be broken on the field of Jena. In the very winter of Jena the philosopher Fichte came to lecture in Berlin, while it was still in the occupation of the French. ~ There was no university in the Prussian capital of those days, and the lectures were delivered not to young students, but to the maturest brains of the country in the fever of a great crisis. Fichte taught the philosophy of patriotism at a time when the German universities were devoted to the abstract worship of knowledge and art. In the next few years, between 1806 and 1813, was established that close connection between the army, the bureaucracy, and the schools, or, in other words, between the needs of government and the aims of education, which constituted the essencc and perverse strength of the Prussian system. Universal military service was correlated with universal compulsory schooling, inaugurated in Prussia two generations before the English Education Act of 1870; the University of Berlin, with a brilliant professorate, was established as sister to the Great General Staff. Thus knowledge in Prussia was no longer pursued mainly for its own sake, but as a means to an end, and that end was the success of a state which had experienced bitter disaster. It was a camp-state, moreover, in the midst of a plain, without the natural bulwarks of a Spain, a France, or a Britain. The end determines the means, and since the Prussian end was military strength, based of necessity on stark discipline, the means were inevita- bly materialistic. Judged from the standpoint of Berlin, it was a wonder- ful thing to have impressed Kultur, or strategical mentally,, on the educated class of a whole people, but fi'om the standpoint of civilization at large it was a fatal momentum to have given to a nation---fatal, that is to say, in the long run, either to civilization or that nation.
We have had for a byword in these times the German war map. It may be questioned however, whether most people in Britain and America have fully realized the part played by the map in German education during the past three generations. Maps are the essential apparatus of Kultur, and every educated German is a geographer in a sense that is true of very few Englishmen or Americans. He has been taught to see in maps not merely the conventional boundaries established by scraps of paper, but permanent physical oppo .rtunities--"ways and means" in the literal sense of the words. His Real-Politik lives in his mind upon a mental map. The serious teaching of geography in German high schools and universities dates from the very beginning of Kultur. It was organized in the generation after Jena, mainly by the labors of four men--Alexander yon Humboldt, Berghaus, Carl Ritter, and Stieler--who were attached to the new University of Berlin and to the since famous map-house ofPerthes of Gotha. To this day, notwithstand- ing all that has been done by two or three exceptional map-houses in this country, if you want a good map, conveying accurately and yet graphically the fundamental contrasts, you must have resort as often as not to one of German origin. The reason is that in Germany there are many cartographers who are scholarly geographers and not merely surveyors or draftsmen. They can exist, because there is a wide public educated to appreciate and pay for intelligently drawn maps? In this country we value the moral side of education, and it is perhaps intuitively that we have neglected materialistic geography. Before the war not a few teachers, within my knowledge, objected to geography as a subject of education, on the ground that it tended to promote imperialism, just as they objected to physical drill because it tended to militarism. We may laugh at such excesses of political caution, as men of former centuries scoffed at the anchorites who secreted them- selves from the world, but the protest in each case was against an excess in the opposite direction. Berlin-Bagdad, Berlin-Herat, Berlin-Pekin---not heard as mere words, but visualized on the mental relief matt--involve for most Anglo-Saxons a new mode of thought, lately and imperfectly introduced among us by the rough maps of the newspapers. But your Prussian, and his father, and his grandfather have debated such concepts all their lives, pencil in hand. In arranging the detailed terms of peace, our statesmen will, no doubt, have the advice of excellent geographical experts, but the German representatives will have behind them not merely a few experts but a great geographically instructed public, long familiar with every important aspect of the questions which will arise, and quick to give a farsighted support to their leaders. This may easily become a decisive advantage, especially should our people pass into a magnanimous frame of mind. It would be a curious thing if the successes of Talleyrand and Metternich, in the secret diplomacy of 1814, were repeated by the spokesmen of the defeated states of our own time under the conditions imposed upon diplomacy by popular gov- ernment! ~ The map habit of thought is no less pregnant in the sphere of economics than it is in that of strategy.
True that laissez-faire had little use for it, but the "most favored nation" clause which Germany imposed on defeated France in the Treaty of Frankfurt had quite a different meaning for the strategical German mind to that which was attached to it by honest Cobdenites. The German bureaucrat built upon it a whole structure of preferences for German trade. Of what use to Britain under her northern skies was the most favored nation clause when Germany granted a concession to Italy in the matter of import duties on olive oil? Would there not also be railway trucks to be returned to Italy which might as well return loaded with German exports? The whole system of most voluminous and intricate commercial treaties between Germany and her neighbors was based on a minute study of commercial routes and of the lie of productive areas. The German official was thinking in the concrete detail of"living," while his British counterpart was absorbed in the negative principle of "letting live."
Kaiser Wilhelm told us that this war was a struggle between two views of the world. "View" is characteristic of the organizer; he sees things from above. Kipling agreed with the Kaiser, but in the language of simple men below, when he declared that there is human feeling and German feeling. The organizer, as organizer, is inevitably inhuman, or rather unhuman. No doubt both Kaiser and poet exaggerated in order to emphasize opposing tendencies; even a democracy must have organizers, just as there must be someremnant of kindliness even among the students of Kultur. The real question is as to which shall have the last word in the state---the idealists or the organizers. Interna- tionalists are in futile revolt against all organization when they would have war of the proletariat on the bourgeoisie. Democracy refuses to think strategically unless and until compelled to do so for purposes of defense. That, of course, does not prevent democracy from declaring war for an ideal, as was seen during the French Revolution. One of the inconsistencies of our pacifists to-day is that they so often urge intervention in the affairs of other nations. In the Middle Ages vast unorganized crowds set out to march against the infidel and perished fecklessly by the way. It was not from lack of warning that the Western democracies were unprepared for the present war. At the same moment, early in this century, to cite only the case of Great Britain, three honored voices were appealing to our sovereign people and were not heard: Lord Rosebery called for efficiency, Mr. Chamberlain for economic defense, and Lord Roberts for military training. Democracy implies rule by consent of the average citizen, who does not view things from the hilltops, for he must be at his work in the fertile plains. There is no good in railing at the character- istics of popular government, for they are its qualities and no mere defects. President Wilson admits them when he says we must make the world a safe place henceforth for democracies. They were no less admitted in the British House of Commons when responsible ministers took pride in the fact that, save in respect of the defensive force of the navy, we were not prepared for the war. The democrat thinks in principles, be they--according to his idiosyn- crasy----ideals, prejudices, or economic laws. The organizer, on the other hand, plans construction, and, like an architect, must consider the ground for his foundations and the materials with which he will build. It must be concrete and detailed consideration, for bricks may be most suitable for his walls, but stone for his lintels, and timber and slate for his roof. If it be a state which he is erecting---not, be it noted, a nation which is growing---he must carefully consider the territory which it is desirable to occupy and the social structures--not economic laws--which are to his handas the result of history. So he opposes his strategy to the ethics of the democrat. Fierce moralists allow no extenuation for sin however persistent the temptation, and great undoubtedly must be the reward in heaven for the slum-dweller who "keeps straight." But practical reformers give much of their thought to the housing problemT Of late our political moralists have been very fierce. They preached the narrow way of"no annexations, no indemnities." In other words, they refused to reckon with the realities of geography and economics. Had we but faith as a grain of mustard seed in average human nature, could we not remove the mountains! Practical sense, however, warns us that it would be wise to seize the present opportunity, when for once the democratic nations are efficiently armed to make the world a safe place for democracies when going about their ordinary business. In other words, we must see to the housing problem of our coming League of Nations. We must reckon presciently with the realities of space and time, and not be content merely to lay down on paper good principles of conduct. The good may not always appear the same even to those who are now allies, and will pretty surely appear not good, for a time at least, to our present enemies. "No annexations, no indemnities" was no doubt a rallying cry not meant by its authors to support existing tyrannies. But it is surely legitimate to remark that there is a wide difference between the attitude of the lawyer with his presumptions unless there be proof to the contrary, and that of the business man untied by formulae. The one does things, and the other, at best, allows them to be done. In the past, democracy has looked with suspicion on .the activities even of popular governments, and therein has shown a wise self- knowledge. It used to be thought, and sooner or later will be thought again, that the main function of the state in free countries is to prevent tyrannous things from being done whether by offenders at home or invaders from abroad. Average citizenship is not a likely base for daring innovations. Adventurers, sole or corporate, must therefore he left to blaze the way to progress. In military and bureaucratic states it is otherwise; Napoleon could be a pioneer, as might have been Joseph II if his conservative subjects had not successfully revolted against him. In Prussia all progress has been state engineered, but then progress there has meant merely increase of efficiency? To save democracy, however, in its recent jeopardy we suspended the very safeguards of democracy, and allowed our governments to organize us not merely for defense but for offense. Had the war been short, this would have been a mere parenthesis in history. But it has been long, and social structures have wasted in part, and in part have been diverted to new uses, so that habits and vested interests have dissolved, and all society is as clay in our hands, if only we have the cunning to mold it while it is still yielding. But the art of the clay- molder, as of the worker in hot metal, lies not merely in knowing what he would make, but also in allowing for the properties of the material in which he is working. He must not only have artistic aims, but also technical knowledge; his human initiative must reckon with reality; he must cultivate his "ways and means" mind, while he tries to retain his ideals of form. As the artist endeavors to his dying day to learn ever more about the medium in which he works and not merely more in a scientific sense, but in a practical "tactile" way, gaining, as we say, greater command over his material---so has it been with the knowledge of humanity at large in regard to the realities of the round world on which we must practice the intricate art of living together. It is not merely that we have amassed vast encyclopaedias of fact, but that, as we live through each new epoch, we see all the past and all the present with new eyes and from new standpoints. It is obvious that these four years of war have wrought a change in human outlook the like of which was not effected in all the previous life of those of us who have gray hairs. Yet, when we look back with our present knowledge, is it not clear that the currents of thought now running so tumultuously were already setting in gently some twenty years ago? In the last years of last century and the first of this, the organizers at Berlin and the minorities in London and Paris had already discerned the new drift of the straws. ~ I propose trying to depict some of the realities, geographical and economic, in their twentieth-century perspective. The facts will most of them be old and familiar. But, in the language of the Mediaeval schoolmen, there is a great difference between vera causa and causa causans--mere academic learning and the realization which impels to action.
The physical facts of geography have remained substantially the same during the fifty or sixty centuries of recorded human his- tory. Forests have been cut down, marshes have been drained, and deserts may have broadened, but the outlines of land and water, and the lie of mountains and rivers have not altered except in detail. The influence of geographical conditions upon human activities has depended, however, not merely on the realities as we now know them to be and to have been, but in even greater degree on what men imagined in regard to them. The ocean has been one throughout history, but for effective human purposes there were two oceans, western and eastern, until the Cape of Good Hope was rounded only four hundred years ago. So did it happen that Admiral Mahan in the closing years of last century could still base a new message in regard to sea-power on a text from the first chapter of Genesis. The ocean was one ocean all the time, but the practical meaning of that great reality was not wholly understood until a few years ago---perhaps it is only now being grasped in its entirety. Each century has had its own geographical perspective. Men still living, though past the age of military service, were taught from a map of the world on which nearly all the interior of Africa was a blank; yet last year General Smuts could address the Royal Geographical Society on the German ambition to control the world from the now explored vantage-ground of Central Africa. The geographical perspec- tive of the twentieth century differs, however, from that of all the previous centuries in more than mere extension. In outline our geograph- ical knowledge is now complete. We have lately attained to the North Pole, and have found that it is in the midst of a deep sea, and to the South Pole, and have found it upon a high plateau. With those final discoveries the book of the pioneers has been closed. No considerable fertile new land, no important mountain range, and no first-class river can any more be the reward of adventure. Moreover, the map of the world had hardly been sketched before claims to the political ownership of all the dry land had been pegged out. Whether we think of the physical, economic, military, or political interconnection of things on the surface of the globe, we are now for the first time presented with a closed system. The known does not lade any longer through the half- known into the unknown; there is no longer elasticity of political expansion in lands beyond the pale. Every shock, every disaster or superfluity, is now felt even to the antipodes, and may indeed return from the antipodes, as the air waves from the eruption of the volcano Krakatoa in the year 1883 were propelled in rings over the globe until they converged to a point in the opposite hemisphere, and thence diverged again to meet once more over Krakatoa, the seat of their origin. Every deed of humanity will henceforth be echoed and reechoed in like manner round the world. That, in the ultimate analysis, is why every considerable state was bound to be drawn into the recent war, if it lasted, as it did last, long enough. To this day, however, our view of the geographical realities is colored for practical purposes by our preconceptions from the past. In other words, human society is still related to the facts of geography not as they are but in no small measure as they have been approached in the course of history. It is only with an effort that we can yet realize them in the true, the complete, and therefore detached, perspective of the twentieth century. This war has taught us rapidly, but there are still vast numbers of our citizens who look out on to a vivid Western foreground, but only to a very dim Eastern background. In order there- fore to appreciate where we now stand, it will be worth while to consider shortly the stages by which we have arrived. Let us begin with the succeeding phases of the seaman's outlook.
Imagine a vast tawny desert, raised a few hundred feet above the sea level. Imagine a valley with precipitous rocky slopes trenched into this desert plateau, and the floor of the valley carpeted with a strip of black soil, through the midst of which winds northward for five hundred miles a silvery navigable river. That river is the Nile flowing from where the granite rocks of Assouan break its navigability at the first cataract to where its waters divide at the head of the Delta. From desert edge to desert edge across the valley is a crow-fly distance of some ten or twenty miles. Stand on one of the brinks with the desert behind you; the rocky descent falls from your feet to the strip of plain below, and away over the floods of the summer-time, or the green of the growing winter-time or the golden harvests of the spring, you are faced by the opposing wall of rock rising to the other desert. The recesses in those rock fronts were carved long ago into cavernous temples and tombs, and the salient into mighty effigies of kings and gods. Egypt, in this long sunken belt, was anciently civilized because all the essential physical advantages were here combined for men to work upon. On the one hand were a rich soil, abundant water, and a powerful sunshine; hence fertility for the support of a population in affluence. On the other hand was a Smooth waterway within half a dozen miles or less of every field in the country. There was also motive power for shipping, since the river current carried vessels northward, and the Etesian winds--- known on the ocean as the trade-winds---brought them southward again. Fertility and a line of communicationo~ man-power and facilities for its organization; there are the essential ingredients for a kingdom. We are asked to picture the early condition of Egypt as that of a valley held by a chain of tribes, who fought with one another in fleets of great war canoes, just as later tribes have fought on the river Congo in our own time. Some one of these tribes, having defeated its neighbors, gained possession of a longer section of the valley, a more extensive material basis for its man-power, and on that basis organized further conquests. At last the whole length of the valley was brought under a single rule, and the kings of all Egypt established their palace at Thebes. Northward and southward, by boat on the Nile, traveled their adminis- trators---their messengers and their magistrates. Eastward and westward lay the strong defense of the deserts, and at the northern limit, against the sea pirates, a belt of marsh round the shore of the Delta?
Now carry your mind to the "Great Sea," the Mediterranean. You have there essentially the same physical ingredients as in Egypt but on a larger scale, and you have based upon them not a mere kingdom but the Roman Empire. From the Phoenician coast for two thousand miles westward lies the broad water-way to its mouth at Gibraltar, and on either hand are fertile shorelands with winter rains and harvest sunshine. But there is a distinction to be made between the dwellers along the Nile banks and those along the Mediterranean shores. The conditions of human activity are relatively uniform in all parts of Egypt; each of the constituent tribes would have its farmers and its boatmen. But the races round the Mediterranean became specialized; some were content to till their fields and navigate their rivers at home, but others gave most of their energy to seamanship and foreign commerce. Side by side, for instance, dwelt the home-staying, corn-growing Egyptians and the adventurous Phoenicians. A long and more sustained effort of organization was therefore needed to weld all the kingdoms of the Mediterranean into a single political unit. Modem research has made it plain that the leading seafaring race of antiquity came at all times from that square of water between Europe and Asia which is known alternatively as the Aegean Sea and the Archipelago, the "Chief Sea" of the Greeks. Sailors from this sea would appear to have taught the Phoenicians their trade in days when as yet Greek was not spoken in the "Isles of the Gentiles." It is of deepest interest for our present purpose to note that the center of civilization in the pre-Greek world of the Aegean, according both to the indications of mythology and the recent excavation, was in the Island of Crete. Was that the first base of sea-power? From that home did the seamen fare who, sailing northward, saw the coast of the rising sun to their right hand, and of the setting sun to their left hand, and named the one Asia and the other Europe? Was it from Crete that the sea-folk settled round the other shores of the Aegean "sea-chamber," forming to this day a coastal veneer of Greek population in front of peoples of other race a few miles inland? There are so many islands in the Archipelago that the name has become, like the Delta of Egypt, one of the common descriptive terms of geography. But Crete is the largest and most fruitful of them. Have we here a firm instance of the importance of the larger base for sea-power? The man-power of the sea must be nourished by land fertility somewhere, and other things being equal--such as security of the home and energy of the people-- that power will control the sea which is based on the greater resources. The next phase of Aegean development teaches apparently the same lesson. Horses-riding tribes of Hellenic speech came down from the north into the peninsula which now forms the mainland of Greece, and settled, Hellenizing the early inhabitants. These Hellenes advanced into the terminal limb of the peninsula, the Peloponnese, slenderly attached to the continent by the isthmus of Corinth. Thence, organizing sea- power on their relatively considerable peninsular base, one of the Hel- lenic tribes, the Dorians, conquered Crete, a smaller though completely insular base. Some centuries passed, during which the Greeks sailed round the southern headlands of the Peloponnese into the Ionian Sea, and colo- nized along the shores of that sea also. So the peninsula came.to be a citadel in the midst of the Greek sea-world. Along the outer shores of the twin water, Aegean and Ionian, the Greek colonists were but a fringe exposed to attack from behind.
Only in the central peninsula were they relatively, although as the sequel shows not absolutely, safe. To the eastern, outer shore of the Aegean the Persians came down from the interior against the Greek cities by the sea, and the Athenian fleet carried aid from the peninsular citadel to the threatened kinsfolk over the water, and issue was joined between sea-power and land- power. A Persian sea-raid was defeated at Marathon, and the Persians then resorted to the obvious strategy of baffled land-power; under King Xerxes they marched round, throwing a bridge of boats over the Dardanelles, and entered the peninsula from the north, with the idea of destroying the nest whence the wasps emerged which stung them and flew elusively away. The Persian effort failed, and it was reserved for the half-Greek, half-barbaric Macedonians, established in the root of the Greek Peninsula itself, to end the first cycle of sea-power by conquering to south of them the Greek sea-base, and then marching into Asia, and through Syria into Egypt, and on the way destroying Tyre of the Phoenicians. Thus they made a "closed sea" of the Eastern Mediterranean by depriving both the Greeks and the Phoenicians of their bases. That done, the Macedonian king, Alexander, could advance light-heartedly into Upper Asia. We may talk of the mobility of ships and of the long arm of the fleet, but, after all, sea-power is fundamentally a matter of appropriate bases, productive and secure. Greek sea-power passed through the same phases as Egyptian river-power. The end of both was the same; without the protection of a navy, commerce moved securely over a water-way because all the shores were held by one and the same land-power. Now we go to the Western Mediterranean. Rome there began as a fortified town on a hill, at the foot of which was a bridge and a river- wharf. This hill-bridge-portqown was the citadel and market of a small nation of farmers, who tilled Latium, the "broad land" or plain, between the Apennines and the sea. "Father" Tiber was for shipping purposes merely a creek, navigable for the small sea-craft of those days, which entered thus from the coast a few miles into the midst of the plain, but that was enough to give Rome the advantage over her rivals, the towns crowning the Alban and Etruscan hills of the neighborhood. Rome had the bridge and the inmost port just as had London. Based on the productivity of Latium, the Romans issued from the Tiber to traffic round the shores of the Western Mediterranean. Soon they came into competition with the Carthaginians, who were based on the fertility of the Merjerdeh Valley in the opposite promontory of Africa. The First Punic or Phoenician War ensued, and the Romans victoriously held the sea. They then proceeded to widen their base by annexing all the peninsular part of Italy as far as the Rubicon River. In the Second Punic War, the Carthaginian general, Hannibal, en- deavored to outflank the Roman sea-power by marching round it, as Xerxes and Alexander had done in regard to the sea-powers opposed to them. He carried his army over the western narrows from Africa into Spain, and then advanced through Southern Gaul into Italy. He was defeated, and Rome annexed the Mediterranean coasts of Gaul and Spain. By taking Cathage itself in the Third Punic War, she made a "closed sea" of the Western Mediterranean, for all the shores were held by one and the same land-power. There remained the task of uniting the controls of the western and eastern basins of the Mediterranean, connected by the Sicilian Strait and the Strait of Messina. The Roman legions passed over into Macedo- nia and thence into Asia, but the distinction between Latin West and Greek East remained, as was evident when civil war came to be waged between the Roman governors of the West and the East, Caesar and Antony.
At the sea-fight of Actium, one of the decisive battles of the world's history, the Western fleet of Caesar destroyed the Eastern fleet of Antony. Thenceforth for five centuries the entire Mediterranean was a "closed sea"; and we think in consequence of the Roman Empire as chiefly a land-power. No fleet was needed, save a few police vessels, to maintain as complete a command of the arterial sea-way of the Mediterranean as ever the kings of Egypt exercised over their Nile- way. Once more land-power terminated a cycle of competition upon the water by depriving sea-power of its bases. True that there had been the culminating sea-battle of Actium, and that Caesar's fleet had won the reward of all finally successful fleets, the command over all the sea. But that command was not afterwards maintained upon the sea, but upon the land by holding the coasts. When Rome had completed the organization of her power round the Mediterranean, there followed a long transitional epoch, during which the oceanic development of Western civilization was gradually preparing. The transition began with the Roman road system, con- structed for the greater mobility of the marching legions. After the close of the Punic Wars four Latin-speaking provinces encircled the Western Mediterranean--Italy, Southern Gaul, Eastern and Southern Spain, and Carthaginian Africa. The outer boundary of the African province was protected by the Sahara desert, and Italy has in rear the Adriatic moat, but in Gaul and Spain Rome found herself the uncomfortable neighbor of independent Celtic tribes. Thus the familiar dilemma of empire presented itself; to advance and end the menace, or to entrench and shut it out, but leave it in being. A still virile people chose the former course, and the frontier and the roads were carried through to the ocean along a thousand miles of frontage between Cape St. Vincent and the mouths of the Rhine. As a conse- quence the Latin portion of the Empire came to be based on two features of physical geography: on the one hand was the Latin Sea---the Western Mediterranean; and on the other hand was the Latin Peninsula, between the Mediterranean and the ocean. ~ Julius Caesar penetrated to the Bay of Biscay, and built a fleet wherewith he defeated the fleet of the Veneti of Brittany. Then because the Celts of Britain were giving help to their Gallic kinsmen, he crossed the Channel and smote them in their island base. A hundred years later the Romans conquered all the lower and more fruitful portion of Britain, and so eliminated the risk of the rise of a sea-power off the Gallic coast. In this way the Channel also became a "closed sea," controlled by land-power. After four centuries the land-power of Rome waned, and the seas on either side of the Latin Peninsula then soon ceased to be "closed." The Norsemen raided over the North Sea from their fiords, and through the Channel, and through the Straits of Gibraltar, even into the recesses of the Mediterranean, enveloping with their sea-power the whole great peninsula. They seized forward bases in the islands of Britain and Sicily, and even nibbled at the mainland edges in Normandy and South- ern Italy. At the same time the Saracen camel-men came down from Arabia and took Carthage, Egypt, and Syria from the Empire--the provinces, that is to say, south of the Mediterranean. Then they launched their fleets on the water, and seized part of Sicily and part of Spain for overseas bases. Thus the Mediterranean ceased to be the arterial way of an empire, and became the frontier moat dividing Christendom from Islam. But the greater sea-power of the Saracen enabled them to hold Spain, though north of the water, just as at an earlier time the greater sea-power of Rome had enabled her to hold Carthagc, though south of the water. For a thousand years Latin Christendom was thus imprisoned in the Latin Peninsula and its appendant island of Britain. Fifteen hundred miles northeastward, measured in a straight line, trends the oceanic coast from the Sacred Promontory of the ancients to the Straits of Copenhagen, and fifteen hundred miles eastward, measured in the same way, lies the sinuous Mediterranean coast from the Sacred Promontory to the Straits at Constantinople. A lesser peninsula advances towards the main peninsula at each strait, Scandinavia on the one hand, and Asia Minor on the other; and behind the land bars so formed are two land-girt basins, the Baltic and Black Seas. If Britain be considered as balancing Italy, the symmetry of the distal end of the main peninsula is such that you might lay a Latin cross upon it with the head in Germany, the arms in Britain and Italy, the feet in Spain, and the center in France, thus typifying that ecclesiastical empire of the five nations which, though shifted northward, was the medieval heir of the Roman Caesars. Towards the East, however, where the Baltic and Black Seas first begin to define the peninsular character of Europe, the outline is less shapely, for the Balkan Peninsula protrudes southward, only taper- ing finally into the historic little peninsula of Greece. Is it not tempting to speculate on what might have happened had Rome not refused to conquer eastward of the Rhine? Who can say that a single mighty sea-power, wholly Latinized as far as the Black and Baltic Seas, would not have commanded the world from its peninsular base? But classical Rome was primarily a Mediterranean and not a peninsular power, and the Rhine-Danube frontier must be regarded as demarking a penetration from the Mediterranean coast rather than as the incomplete achievement of a peninsular policy.
It was the "opening" again of the seas on either hand which first compacted Europe in the peninsular sense. Reaction had to be organized, or the pressures from north and south would have obliterated Chris- tendom. So Charlemagne erected an empire astride of the Rhine, half Latin and half German by speech, but wholly Latin ecclesiastically. With this empire as base the Crusades were afterwards undertaken. Seen in large perspective at this distance of time, and from the seaman's point of view, the Crusades, if successful, would have had for their main effect the ~'closing" once more of the Mediterranean Sea. The long series of these wars, extending over two centuries, took two courses. On the one hand, fleets were sent out from Venice and Genoa to Jaffa and Acre on the Syrian coast; on the other hand, armies marched through Hungary, along the famous "corridor" of the Morava and Maritza Valleys, and through Constantinople and Asia Minor into Syria. The comparison is obvious between these campaigns of the Crusaders by land, from a German base round to the back of the Mediterranean Sea, and the similar campaign of Alexander from his Macedonian base. A good many parallels might, indeed, be drawn between the half-Greek Macedonians and the half-Latin Germans. No Greek of the full blood but looked upon a Macedonian as a sort of bastard! But his position in the broad root of the Greek Peninsula enabled the Macedonian to conquer the Greek sea-base, as the position of the German in the broad root of the greater Latin Peninsula has always made him dangerous to the Latin sea-bases beyond the Rhine and the Alps. The peoples of the Latin civilization were thus hardened by a winter of centuries, called the Dark Ages, during which they were besieged in their homeland by the Mohammedans, and failed to break out by their Crusading sorties. Only in the fifteenth century did time ripen for the great adventure on the ocean which was to make the world European. It is worth pausing for a moment to consider further the unique environ- ment in which the Western strain of our human breed developed the enterprise and tenacity which have given it the lead in the modern world. Europe is but a small corner of the great island which also contains Asia and Africa, but the cradle land of the Europeans was only a half of Europe--the Latin Peninsula and the subsidiary peninsulas and islands clustered around it. Broad deserts lay to the south, which could be crossed only in some three months on camel hack, so that the black men were fended off from the white men. The trackless ocean lay to the west, and to the north the frozen ocean. To the northeast were interminable pine forests, and rivers flowing either to ice-choked mouths in the Arctic Sea or to inland waters, such as the Caspian Sea, detached from the ocean. Only to the southeast were there practicable oasis routes leading to the outer world, but these were closed, more or less completely, from the seventh to the nineteenth century, by the Arabs and the Turks. In any case, however, the European system of waterways was de- tached by the Isthmus of Suez from the Indian Ocean. Therefore from the seaman's point of view Europe was a quite definite conception, even though the landsman might think of it as merging with Asia. It was a world apart, but within that world was ample fertility, and in its water-paths a natural provision for the intimacy of a family of nations. Water-paths they were, with branchings and crossings, for the boatmen, not venturing out on to the high seas still sailed between the coasts and the horizon, just as they threaded their way between the two banks of the rivers. In the relatively roadless days, moreover, which followed on the decay of the Roman road system, the boatmen frequented many of the headwaters of the rivers, which we have now abandoned as no longer worth navigating. There were two fortunate circumstances in regard to the medieval siege of Europe. On the one hand, the Infidels had not command of inexhaustible man-power, for they were based on arid and sub-arid deserts and steppes, and on comparatively small oasis lands; on the other hand, the Latin Peninsula was not seriously threatened along its oceanic border, for the Norsemen, though fierce and cruel while they remained pagan, were based on fiord .valleys even less extensive and less fruitful than the oases, and wherever they settled---in England, Normandy, Sicily, or Russia--their small numbers were soon absorbed into the older populations. Thus the whole defensive strength of Europe could be thrown against the southeastern danger. But as the European civilization gained momentum, there was energy to spare upon the ocean frontage; Venice and Austria sufficed for the later struggle against the Turks. After the essays, without practical result, of the Norsemen to force their way through the northern ice of Greeland, the Portuguese under- took to find a seaway to the Indies round the coast of Africa. They were inspired to the venture by the lead of Prince Henry, "the Naviga- tor," half Englishman and half Portuguese. At first sight it seems strange that pilots like Columbus, who had spent their lives on coasting voyages, often going from Venice to Britain, should so long have delayed an exploration southward as they issued from the Straits of Gibraltar. Still more strange does it appear that when at last they had set themselves to discover the outline of Africa, it took them two generations of almost annual voyaging before Da Gama led the way into the Indian Ocean. The cause of their difficulties was physical. For a thousand miles, from the latitude of the Canary Islands to that of Cape Verde, the African coast is a torrid desert, because the dry trade- wind there blows off the land without ceasing.
It might be a relatively easy matter to sail southward on that steady breeze, but how was the voyage back to be accomplished by ships which could not sail near the wind like a modem clipper, and yet dared neither sail out on to the broad ocean across the wind, nor yet tediously tack their way home off a coast with no supplies of fresh food and water, in a time when the plague of scurvy had not yet been mastered? Once the Portuguese had found the ocean-way into the Indian seas, they soon disposed of the opposition of the Arab dhows. Europe had taken its foes in rear; it had sailed round to the rear of the land, just as Xerxes, Alexander, IIannibal, and the Crusaders had marched round to the rear of the sea. From that time until the opening of the Suez Canal in 1869, the seamen of Europe continued in ever-increasing number to round the Cape, and to sail northward on the eastern ocean as far as China and Japan. Only one ship, the Vega of the Swedish Baron Nordenskiold, has to this day made the passage round the north of Asia--with infinite risk, and in two years---and she happens not to have circumnavigated the Triple Continent, for she returned home through the Suez Canal. Nor was the overland journey to the Indies undertaken, except as an adventure, until last century. The trade to the Indies was conducted by coasting--no doubt in a bold way, from point to point, round the great southward promontory whose shores were European and African on the one side, and African and Asiatic on the other. From the point of view of the traffic to the Indies, the world was a vast cape, standing out southward from between Britain and Japan. This world-promontory was enveloped by sea-power, as had been the Greek and Latin promon- tories beforehand: a-ll its coasts were open to ship-borne trade or to attack from the sea. The seamen naturally chose for the local bases of their trading or warfare small islands off the continental coast, such as Mombasa, Bombay, Singapore, and Hongkong, or small peninsulas, such as the Cape of Good Hope and Aden, since those positions offered shelter for their ships and security for their depots. When grown bolder and stronger they put their commercial cities, such as Calcutta and Shanghai, near the entry of great riverways into productive and populous marketlands. The seamen of Europe, owing to their greater mobility, have thus had superiority for some four centuries over the landsmen of Africa and Asia. The passing of the imminent danger to Christendom, because of the relative weakening of Islam, was, no doubt, one of the reasons for the break-up of Medieval Europe at the close of the Middle Ages; already in 1493 the Pope had to draw his famous line through the ocean, from Pole to Pole, in order to prevent Spanish and Portuguese seamen from quarreling. As a result of this break-up, there arose five competing oceanic powers Portuguese, Spanish, French, Dutch and English---in the place of the one power which would, no doubt, have been the ideal of the Crusaders. Thus the outcome of a thousand years of transition, from the ancient to the modern conditions of sea-power, is such as to prompt a compari- son between the Greek and Latin Peninsulas, each with its offset island. 
Peninsular Greece and insular Crete anticipated in their relations the Latin Peninsula and the island of Britain. Under the Dorians the greater resources of the peninsular mainland were utilized for the conquest of Crete, but at a later time the rivalry of Sparta and Athens prevented a full exploitation of the peninsula as a sea-base. So in the case of the greater peninsula and greater island, Britain was conquered and held by Rome from the peninsular mainland; but when the Middle Ages were closing, several rival sea-bases occupied the Latin Peninsula, each of them open to attack from the land behind, as Athens and Sparta had been open to the Macedonian invasion. Of these Latin sea-bases, one, Venice, fronted towards Islam, while the others contended with interne- cine feuds for the command of the ocean, so that in the end the lesser British insular base, faced by no united peninsular base, became the home of a power which enveloped and contained the greater peninsula. Within Great Britain itself it is true that there was not effective unity until the eighteenth century, but the facts of physical geography have determined that there should always be predominant English people in the south of the island, whether as foe or partn, er of the Scottish and Welsh peoples. From Norman days, until the growth of the modern industries upon the coal-fields, the English nation was almost uniquely simple in its structure. It is that which makes English history the epic story that it is, until the histories of Scotland and Ireland come to confuse their currents with it. One fertile plain between the mountains of the west and north and the narrow seas to the east and south, a people of farmers, a single king, a single parliament, a tidal river, a single great city for central market and port--those are the elements on which the England was built whose warning beacons blazed on the hilltops from Plymouth to Berwick-on-Tweed, in that night of Elizabeth's reign when the Spanish Armada had entered the Channel. On a smaller scale, Latium, the Tiber, the city, the senate, and the people of Rome once presented a similar unity and a similar executive strength. The real base historically of British sea-power was our English plain---fertile and detached; coal and iron from round the borders of the plain have been added in later times. The white ensign of the Royal Navy is with some historic justice the flag of St. George, with a "difference" for the minor partners.
Every characteristic of sea-power may be studied in British history during the last three centuries, but the home-base, productive and secure, is the one thing essential to which all things else have been added. We are told that we should thank God daily for our Channel, but as I looked out over the glorious harvest of this English plain in this critical year 1918, it seemed to me that our thanksgiving as a seafaring people should be no less for our fruitful soil. Insular Crete had to yield to the Dorians from the greater peninsula. Four times in the past three centuries was it attempted to overthrow British sea-power from frontages on the penisular coast opposite---from Spain, from Holland, and twice from France. At last, after Trafalgar, British sea-power definitively enveloped the Latin Peninsula, having subsidiary bases at Gibraltar, Malta, and Heligoland. The continental coast line became the effective British boundary, notwithstanding the enemy privateers, and Britain could prepare war at her ease upon the sea. So she undertook the "Peninsular" campaigns in Spain, and landed armies in the Netherlands in aid of her military allies. She even antici- pated Gallipoli by bringing away her armies from Walcheren and Cor- unna. When the Napoleonic War was over, British sea-power encompassed, almost without competition, that great world-promontory which stands forward to the Cape of Good Hope from between Britain and Japan. British merchant ships on the sea were a part of the British Empire; British capital ventured abroad in foreign countries was part of British resources, controlled from the city of London and available for the maintenance of power on and over the seas. It was a proud and lucrative position, and seemed so secure that Victorian folk thought it almost in the natural order of things that insular Britain should rule the seas. We were, perhaps, not quite a popular people in the rest of the world; our position behind a Channel seemed an unfair advantage. But warships cannot navigate the mountains, and since the French wars of the Planta- • genets we have not sought to make permanent European conquests, so that, on the whole, we may hope that the verdict of foreign historians on our Britain of the nineteenth century may resemble that of the famous schoolboy who described his headmaster as "a beast, but a just beast." Perhaps the most remarkable outcome of British sea-power was the position in the Indian Ocean during the generation before the war. The British "Raj" in India depended on support from the sea, yet on all the waters between the Cape of Good Hope, India, and Australia, there was habitually no British battleship or even first-class cruiser. In effect, the Indian Ocean was a "closed sea." Britain owned or "protected" most of the coast lines, and the remaining frontages were either on islands, as the Dutch East Indies, or on territories such as Portuguese Mozambique and German East Africa, which, although continental, were inaccessible under existing conditions by landway from Europe. Save in the Persian Gulf, there could be no rival base for sea-power which combined security with the needful resources, and Britain made it a declared principle of her policy that no sea-base should be estab- lished on either the Persian or Turkish shores of the Persian Gulf. Superficially there is a striking similarity between the closed Mediterra- nean of the Romans, with the Legions along the Rhine frontier, and the closed Indian Ocean, with the British army on the northwest frontier of India. The difference lay in the fact that, whereas the closing of the Mediterranean depended on the Legions, the closing of the Indian seas was maintained by the long arm of sea-power itself from the home-base. In the foregoing rapid survey of the vicissitudes of sea-power, we have not stayed to consider that well-worn theme of the single mastery of the seas. Everyone now realizes that owing to the continuity of the ocean and the mobility of ships, a decisive battle at sea has immediate and far-reaching results. Caesar beat Antony at Actium, and Caesar's orders were enforceable forthwith on every shore of the Mediterranean. Britain won her culminating victory at Trafalgar, and could deny all the ocean to the fleets of her enemies, could transport her armies to whatsoever coast she would and remove them again, could carry sup- plies home from foreign sources, could exert pressure in negotiation on whatsoever offending state has a sea-front. Our concern here has been rather in regard to the bases of sea-power and the relation to these of land-power. In the long run, that is the fundamental question. There were fleets of war canoes on the Nile, and the Nile was closed to their contention by a single land-power controlling their fertile bases through all the length of Egypt. A Cretan insular base was conquered from a larger Greek peninsular base. Macedonian land-power closed the East- ern Mediterranean to the warships both of Greeks and Phoenicians by depriving them impartially of their bases. Hannibal struck overland at the peninsular base of Roman sea-power, and that base was saved by victory on land.
Caesar won the mastery of the Mediterranean by victory on the water, and Rome then retained control of it by the defense of land frontiers. In the Middle Ages Latin Christendom defended itself on the sea from its peninsular base, but in modem times, because competing states grew up within that peninsula, and there were several bases of sea-power upon it, all open to attack from the land, the mastery of the seas passed to a power which was less broadly based, but on an island--fortunately a fertile and coal-bearing island. On sea-power, thus based, British adventurers have found an overseas empire of colo- nies, plantations, depots, and protectorates, and have established, by means of sea-borne armies, local land-powers in India and Egypt. So impressive have been the results of British sea-power that there has perhaps been a tendency to neglect the warnings of history and to regard sea-power in general as inevitably having, because of the unity of the ocean, the last word in the rivalry with land-power. Never has sea-power played a greater part than in the recent war and in the events which led up to it. Those events began some twenty years ago with three great victories won by the British fleet without the firing of a gun. The first was at Manila, in the Pacific Ocean, when a German squadron threatened to intervene to protect a Spanish squadron, which was being defeated by an American squadron, and a British squadron stood by the Americans. Without unduly stressing that single incident, it may be taken as typical of the relations of the Powers during the war between Spain and America, which war gave to America detached possessions both in the Atlantic and Pacific, and led to her undertaking the construction of the Panama Canal, in order to gain the advantages of insularity for the mobilization of her warships. So was a first step taken towards the reconciliation of British and American hearts. More- over the Monroe Doctrine was upheld in regard to South America. The second of these victories of the British fleet was when it held the ocean during the South African War, of such vital consequence to the maintenance of the British rule in India; and the third was when it kept the ring round the Russo-Japanese War, and incidentally kept the door open into China. In all cases history would have been very difI~rent but for the intervention of the British fleet. None the less and perhaps as a consequence---the growth of the German fleet under the successive Navy Laws, induced the withdrawal of the British battle squadrons from the Far East and from the Mediterranean, and co- operation in those seas with the Japanese and French sea-powers. The Great War itself began in the old style, and it was not until 1917 that the new aspects of reality became evident. In the very first days of the struggle the British fleet had already taken command of the ocean, enveloping, with the assistance of the French fleet, the whole peninsular theater of the war on land. The German troops in the German colonies were isolated, German merchant shipping was driven off the seas, the British expeditionary force was transported across the Channel without the loss of a man or a horse, and British and French supplies from over the ocean were safely brought in. In a word, the territories of Britain and France were made one for the purpose of the war, and their joint boundary was advanced to within gunshot range of the German coast---no small offsct for the temporary, though deeply regret- ted, loss of certain French departments. After the battle of the Marne the true war map of Europe would have shown a Franco-British frontier following the Norwegian, Danish, German, Dutch, and Belgian coasts--at a distance of three miles in the case of the neutral coasts--and then running as a sinuous line through Belgium and France to the Jura border of Switzerland. West of that boundary, whether by land or sea, the two Powers could make ready their defense against the enemy. Nine months later Italy dared to join the Allies, mainly because her ports were kept open by the Allied sea-power. On the Eastern front also the old style of war held. Land-power was there divided into two contending forces, and the outer of the two, notwithstanding its incongruous Czardom, was allied with the sea- power of the democratic West. In short, the disposition of forces re- peated in a general way that of a century earlier, when British sea- power supported the Portuguese and Spaniards in "the Peninsula," and was allied with the autocracies of the Eastern land-powers. Napo- leon fought on two fronts, which in the terms of to-day we should describe as Western and Eastern. In 1917, however, came a great change, due to the entry of the United States into the war, the fall of the Russian Czardom, and the subsequent collapse of the Russian fighting strength. The world-strategy of the contest was entirely altered. We have been fighting since, and can afford to say it without hurting any of our allies, to make the world a safe place for democracies. So much as regards idealism.
But it is equally important that we should bear in mind the new face of reality. We have been fighting lately, in the close of the war, a straight duel between land-power and sea-power, and sea-power has been laying siege to land-power. We have conquered, but had Germany conquered she would have established her sea-power on a wider base than any in history, and in fact on the widest possible base. The joint continent of Europe, Asia, and Africa, is now effectively, and not merely theoreti- cally, an island. Now and again, lest we forget, let us call it the World- Island in what follows. One reason why the seamen did not long ago rise to the generalization implied in the expression "World-Island," is that they could not make the round voyage of it. An ice-cap, two thousand miles across, floats on the polar sea, with one edge aground on the shoals off the north of Asia. For the common purposes of navigation, therefore, the continent is not an island. The seaman of the last four centuries have treated it as a vast promontory stretching southward from a vague north, as a mountain peak may rise out of the clouds from hidden foundations. Even in the last century, since the opening of the Suez Canal, the eastward voyage has still been round a promontory, though with the point at Singapore instead of Cape Town. This fact and its vastness have made men think of the Continent as though it differed from other islands in more than size. We speak of its parts as Europe, Asia, and Africa in precisely the same way that we speak of the parts of the ocean as Atlantic, Pacific, and Indian. In theory even the ancient Greeks regarded it as insular, yet they spoke of it as the "World." The school children of to-day are taught of it as the "Old World," in contrast with a certain pair of peninsulas which together constitute the "New World." Seamen speak of it merely as "the Continent," the continuous land. Let us consider for a moment the proportions and relations of this newly realized Great Island. t It is set as it were on the shoulder of the earth with reference to the North Pole. Measuring from Pole to Pole along the central meridian of Asia, we have first a thousand miles of ice-clad sea as far as the northern shore of Siberia, then five thousand miles of land to the southern point of India, and then seven thousand miles of sea to the Antarctic cap of ice-clad land. But measured along the meridian of the Bay of Bengal or of the Arabian Sea, Asia is only some three thousand five hundred miles across. From Paris to Vladivostok is six thousand miles, and from Paris to the Cape of Good Hope is a similar distance; but these measurements are on a globe twenty-six thousand miles round. Were it not for the ice impediments to its circumnavigation, practical seamen would long ago have spoken of the Great Island by some such name, for it is only a little more than one-fifth as large as their ocean. The World-Island ends in points northeastward and southeastward. On a clear day you can see from the northeastern headland across Bering Strait to the beginning of the long pair of peninsulas, each measuring about one twenty-sixth of the globe, which we call the Americas. Superficially there is no doubt a certain resemblance of symmetry in the Old and New Worlds; each consists of two peninsulas, Africa and Euro-Asia in the one case, and North and South America in the other. But there is no real likeness between them. The northern and northeastern shores of Africa for nearly four thousand miles are so intimately related with the opposite shores of Europe and Asia that the Sahara constitutes a far more effective break in social continuity than does the Mediterranean. In the days of air navigation which are coming, sea-power will use the waterway of the Mediterranean and Red Seas only by the sufferance of land-power, a new amphibious cavalry, when the contest with sea-power is in question. But North and South America, slenderly connected at Panama, are for practical purposes insular rather than peninsular in regard to one another. South America lies not merely to south, but also in the main to east of North America; the two lands are in echelon, as soldiers would say, and thus the broad ocean encircles South America, except for a minute proportion of its outline. A like fact is true of North America with reference to Asia, for it stretches out into the ocean from Bering Strait so that, as may be seen upon a globe, the shortest way from Pekin to New York is across Bering Strait, a circumstance which may some day have importance for the traveler by railway or air. The third of the new continents, Australia, lies a thousand miles from the southeastern point of Asia, and measures only one fifth of the surface of the globe. Thus, the ttu'ee so-called new continents are in point of area merely satellites of the old continent. There is one ocean covering nine-twelfths of the globe; there is one continent--the World-Island--covering two- twelfths of the globe; and there are many smaller islands, whereof North America and South America are, for effective purposes, two, which together cover tile remaining one-twelfth. The term "New World" implies, now that we can see that realities and not merely historic appearances, a wrong perspective. The truth, seen with a broad vision, is that in the great world- promontory, extending southward to the Cape of Good Hope, and in the North American sea-base we have, on a vast scale, yet a third contrast of peninsula and island to be set beside the Greek peninsula and the island of Crete, and the Latin Peninsula and the British Island. But there is this vital difference, that the world-promontory, when united by modem overland communications, is in fact the World- Island, possessed potentially of the advantages both of insularity and of incomparably great resources. Leading Americans have for some time appreciated the fact that their country is no longer a world apart, and President Wilson had brought his whole people round to that view when they consented to throw themselves into the war. But North America is no longer even a continent; in this twentieth century it is shrinking to be an island. Americans used to think of their three millions of square miles as the equivalent of all Europe; some day, they said there would be a United States of Europe as sister to the United States of America. Now, though they may not all have realized it, they must no longer think of Europe apart from Asia and Africa. The Old World has become insular, or in other words a unit, incomparably the largest geographical unit on our globe. There is a remarkable parallelism between the short history of America and the longer history of England; both countries have now passed through the same succession of colonial, continental, and insular stages. The Angle and Saxon settlements along the east and south coast of Britain have often been regarded as anticipating the thirteen English colonies along the east coast of North America; what has not always been remembered is that there was a continental stage in English history to be compared with that of Lincoln in America. The wars of Alfred the Great and William the Conqueror were in no small degree between contending parts of England, with the Norsemen intervening, and En- gland was not effectively insular until the time of Elizabeth, because not until then was she free from the hostility of Scotland, and herself united, and therefore a unit, in her relations with the neighboring continent. America is to-day a unit, for the American people have fought out their internal differences, and it is insular, because events are compelling Americans to realize that their so-called continent lies on the same globe as the Continent. Picture upon the map of the world this war as it has been fought in the year 1918. It has been a war between Islanders and Continentals, there can be no doubt of that. It has been fought on the Continent, chiefly across the landward front of peninsular France; and ranged on the one side have been Britain, Canada, the United States, Brazil, Australia, New Zealand, and Japarv--all insular. France and Italy are peninsular, but even with that advantage they would not have been in the war to the end had it not been for the support of the Islanders. India and China so far as China has been in the war on the Manchurian front----may be regarded as advanced guards of British, American, and Japanese sea-power. Dutch Java is the only island of large population which is not in the Western Alliance, and even Java is not on the side of the Continentals.
There can be no mistaking the significance of this unanimity of the islanders. The collapse of Russia has cleared our view of the realities, as the Russian Revolution purified the ideals for which we have been fighting. The facts appear in the same perspective if we consider the population of the globe. More than fourteen-sixteenths of all humanity live on the Great Continent, and nearly one-sixteenth more on the closely offset islands of Britain and Japan. Even to-day, after four centuries of emigra- tion, only about one-sixteenth live in the lesser continents. Nor is time likely to change these proportions materially. If the middle west of North America comes presently to support, let us say, another hundred million people, it is probable that the interior of Asia will at the same time carry two hundred millions more than now, and if the tropical part of South America should feed a hundred million more, then the tropical parts of Africa and the Indies may not improbably support two hundred millions more. The Congo forest alone, subdued to agriculture, would maintain some four hundred million souls if populated with the same density as Java, and the Javanese population is still growing. Have we any right, moreover, to assume that, given its climate and history, the interior of Asia would not nourish a population as virile as that of Europe, North America, or Japan? What if the Great Continent, the whole World-Island or a large part of it, were at some future time to become a single and united base of sea-power? Would not the other insular bases be outbuilt as regards ships and out-manned as regards seamen? Their fleets would no doubt fight with all the heroism begotten of their histories, but the end would be fated. Even in the present war, insular America has had to come to the aid of insular Britain, not because the British fleet could not have held the seas for the time being, but lest such a building and manning base were to be assured to Germany at the Peace, or rather Truce, that Britain would inevitably be outbuilt and outmanned a few years later. The surrender of the German fleet in the Firth of Forth is a dazzling event, but in all soberness, if we would take the long view, must we not still reckon with the possibility that a large part of the Great Continent might some day be united under a single sway, and that an invincible sea-power might be based upon it? May we not have headed off that danger in this war, and yet leave by our settlement the opening for a fresh attempt in the future? Ought we not to recognize that that is the great ultimate threat to the world's liberty so far as strategy is concerned, and to provide against it in our new political system? Let us look at the matter from the landmans's point of view.
Four centuries ago the whole outlook of mankind was changed in a single generation by the voyages of the great pioneers, Columbus, Da Gama, and Magellan. The idea of the unity of the ocean, beforehand merely inferred from the likeness of the tides in the Atlantic and Indian waters, suddenly became a part of the mental equipment of practical men. A similar revolution is in progress in the present generation in the rapid realization of the unity of the Continent owing to modem methods of communication by land and air. The islanders have been slow to understand what is happening. Britain went into the war for the defense of her neighbors, Belgium and France, seeing vaguely perhaps that she was herself threatened through their danger but almost unanimous in her decision only because of a moral tie, her bond in regard to Belgium. America was shocked by the Lusitania tragedy, and was ultimately brought in because of the general infringe- ment of the rights of neutrals by the German submarines. Neither of the Anglo-Saxon nations at first clearly saw the strategical meaning of the war. Theirs was an external view of the Continent, like that of the seamen who named the Guinea, Malabar, Coromandel, and Murman "Coasts." Neither in London nor in New York were international politics commonly discussed in the way in which they are discussed in the caf6s of Continental Europe. In order, therefore, to appreciate the Continental view we must remove our standpoint from without to within the great ring of the "Coasts." Let us begin by "brigading" our data, for only so shall we be able to reason conveniently about the realities which the Continent presents for strategical thought. When you are thinking of large things you must think on broad lines; the colonel of a battalion thinks in companies, 
but the general of a division in brigades. For the purpose of forming our brigades, however, it will be necessary at the outset to go into some degrec of geographical detail. The northern edge of Asia is the inaccessible coast, beset with ice except for a narrow water lane which opens here and there along the shore in the brief summer owing to the melting of the local ice formed in the winter between the grounded floes and the land. It so happens that three of the largest rivers in the world, the Lena, Yenisei, and Obi, stream northward through Siberia to this coast, and are therefore detached for practical purposes from the general system of the ocean and river navigations? South of Siberia are other regions at least as large, drained into salt lakes having no outlet to the ocean; such are the basins of the Volga and Ural Rivers flowing to the Caspian Sea, and of the Oxus and Jaxartes to the Sea of Aral. Geographers usually describe these inward basins as "Continental." Taken together, the regions of Arctic and Continental drainage mcasure nearly a half of Asia and a quarter of Europe, and form a great continuous patch in the north and center of the continent. That whole patch, extending right across from the icy, flat shore of Siberia to the torrid, steep coasts of Baluchistan and Persia, has been inaccessible to navigation from the ocean. The opening of it by railways for it was practically roadless beforehand---and by aeroplane routes in the near future, constitutes a revolution in the relations of men to the larger geographical realities of the world. Let us call this great region the Heartland of the Continent. The north, center, and west of the Heartland are a plain, rising only a few hundred feet at most above sea level. In that greatest lowland on the globe are included Western Siberia, Turkestan, and the Volga basin of Europe, for the Ural Mountains, though a long range, are not of important height, and terminate some three hundred miles north of the Caspian, leaving a broad gateway from Siberia into Europe. Let us speak of this vast plain as the Great Lowland. Southward the Great Lowland ends along the foot of a tableland, whose average elevation is about half a mile, with mountain ridges rising to a mile and a half. This tableland bears upon its broad back the three countries of Persia, Afghanistan, and Baluchistan; for conve- nience we may describe the whole of it as the Iranian Upland. The Heartland, in the sense of the region of Arctic and Continental drainage, includes most of the Great Lowland and most of the Iranian Upland; it extends therefore to the long, high, curving brink of the Persian Mountains, beyond which is the depression occupied by the Euphrates Valley and the Persian Gulf. Now let us travel in imagination to the west of Africa. There, between the latitudes of the Canary and Cape Verde Islands, is a desert coast; it was the character of that coast, it will be remembered, which so long baffled the efforts of the medieval sailors to make the southward voyage round Africa. With a breadth of a thousand miles the Sahara spreads thence across the north of Africa from the Atlantic Ocean to the Valley of the Nile. The Sahara is not everywhere an utter desert; there are many oases--trenched valleys with wells to the water percolating under- ground in their bottoms, or hilly tracts against which at times the clouds gather--but these are minute and scattered exceptions upon a barren and riverless area nearly as large as all Europe. The Sahara is the most unbroken natural boundary in the world; throughout history it has been a barrier between the white and the black men. Between the Sahara and the Heartland there is a broad gap which is occupied by Arabia. The two brinks of the Nile Valley are known as Libyan to the west and Arabian to the east; and away beyond the Lower Euphrates, at the foot of the Persian Mountains, is the district known as Arabistan or the country of the Arabs. In complete harmony, therefore, with local usage, Arabia may be regarded as spreading for eight hundred miles from the Nile to beyond the Euphrates. From the foot of the Taurus Mountains, north of Aleppo, to the Gulf of Aden, it measures no less than eighteen hundred miles. 
As to one-half, Arabia is desert, and as to the other half mainly dry steppes; although it lies in the same latitudes as the Sahara, it is more productive and carries a more considerable population of wandering Bedouin. Moreover, it has larger oases, and therefore larger cities. What, however, most distinguishes Arabia both from the Heartland and the Sahara is the fact that it is traversed by three great waterways in connection with the ocean---the Nile, the Red Sea, and the Euphrates and Persian Gulf. None of these three ways, however, affords naturally a complete passage across the arid belt. The Nile was navigable from the Mediterranean only to the first cataract, midway across the desert, though locks have now been constructed at Assouan which give access as far as the second cataract; and the navigation of the Euphrates ascends only to a point a hundred miles from the Mediterranean. To-day it is true that the Suez Canal unites the Mediterranean to the Red Sea, but it was not only the isthmus which formerly impeded through traffic by this route; persistent north winds of the trade-wind current blow down the northern end of the Red Sea, which is beset with rocks, and sailing ships do not willingly attempt the northward voyage to the Canal, which would therefore have been relatively useless but for steam navigation. The former Red Sea route to the Mediterranean was from Kosseir on the west coast over the desert to the Nile at Keneh, and then down the Nile; that was the way followed by the British army when sent from India to Egypt more than a hundred years ago at the time of the Napoleonic invasion of Egypt and Palestine. It follows from the foregoing description that the Heartland, Arabia, and the Sahara together constitute a broad, curving belt inaccessible to seafaring people, except by the three Arabian waterways. This belt extends completely across the great continent from the Arctic to the Atlantic shores. In Arabia it touches the Indian Ocean, and, as a conse- quence, divides the remainder of the Continent into three separate regions whose rivers flow to the ice-free ocean. These regions are the Pacific and Indian slopes of Asia; the peninsulas and islands of Europe and the Mediterranean; and the great promontory of Africa south of the Sahara. The last named differs from the other two regions in a very important respect. Its larger rivers, the Niger, Zambesi, and Congo, and also its smaller rivers, such as the Orange and Limpopo, flow across the tableland of the interior, and fall steeply over its edge to relatively short seaward reaches in the narrow coastal lowlands. The long upland courses of these rivers are navigable for several thousand miles, but are for practical purposes as completely detached from the ocean as the rivers of Siberia. The same, of course, is true of the Nile above the cataracts. We may, therefore, regard the interior of Africa south of the Sahara as a second Heartland. Let us speak of it as the Southern Heartland, in contra-distinction to the Northern Heartland of Asia and Europe. Notwithstanding their very different latitudes the two Heartlands present other striking similarities. A great belt of forest, mainly of the evergreen type of the pines and firs, spreads from North Germany and the Baltic shore right across to Manchuria, connecting by a forest ribbon, as it were, the forests of Europe with those of the Pacific Coast. South of this forest zone the Heartland lies open, with trees only along the river banks and upon the mountains. This vast, open ground is a luscious prairie along the southern border of the forest, and brilliant with bulb flowers in the spring-time, but southward, as the aridity increases, the grass becomes coarser and more sparse. The whole grass- land, rich and poor, is conveniently spoken of as the steppes, although that name properly belongs only to the less fertile southem tracts which surround the desert patches of Turkestan and Mongolia. The steppes were probably the original habitat of the horse, and in their southern parts, of the two-humped camel (Fig. 18). The Southern Heartland also has its wide open grasslands, which in the Sudan gradually increase in fertility from the edge of the Sahara towards the tropical forest of the Guinea Coast and the Congo. The forests do not spread completely across to the Indian Oceans but leave a belt of grassy upland which connects the grasslands of the Sudan with those of South Africa, and this immense, open ground, thus continuous from the Sudan to the Cape Veldt, is the home of the antelopes, zebras, and other large hoofed game, which correspond to the wild horses and wild asses of the Northern Heartland. Though the zebra has not been successfully domesticated and the South African natives had no usual beast of burden, yet the horse and the one-humped camel of Arabia were early introduced into the Sudan. In both Heart- lafids, therefore, although to a greater extent in the Northern than in the Southern, mobility by the aid of animals has been available to replace the riverwise and coastwise mobility of the ships of the Atlantic and Pacific coastlands. 
The Northern Heartland adjoins Arabia, as we have seen, for many hundred miles where the Iranian Upland drops to the Euphrates Valley; the Southern Heartland, at its northeastern comer in Abyssinia and Somaliland, grasps, though with an interval of sea, the southern fertile angle of Arabia, known as Yemen. So the steppes of Arabia, enfi'aming its deserts, serve as a passage-land between the Northern and Southern Heartlands; and there is also the way by the banks of the Nile through Nubia. Thus it will be realized that the Northern Heartland, Arabia, and the Southern Heartland afford a broad, grassy way for horsemen and camel-men from Siberia through Persia, Arabia, and Egypt into the Sudan, and that but for the tsetse-fly and other plagues men would probably have penetrated on horseback and camel-back southward almost to the Cape of Good Hope. Outside Arabia, the Sahara, and the two Heartlands, there remain in the World-Island only two comparatively small regions, but those two regions are the most important on the globe. Around the Mediterra- nean, and in the European peninsulas and islands, there dwell four hundred million people, and in the southern and eastern coastlands of Asia, or, to use the historic expression, in the Indies, there dwell eight hundred million people. In these two regions, therefore, are three- quarters of the people of the world. From our present point of view the most pertinent way of stating this great fact is to say that four- fifths of the population of the Great Continent, the World-Island, live in two regions which together measure only one-fifth of its area. These two regions resemble one another in certain other very im- portant respects. In the first place, their rivers are for the most part navigable continuously from the ocean. In the Indies we have this series of large rivers descending to the open sea; Indus, Ganges, Brahmaputra, Irrawady, Salwen, Menam, Mekong, Songho, Sikiang, Yangtse, Hoan- gho, Peiho, Liauho, Amur. Most of them are navigable from their mouths for some hundreds of miles; a British battleship once steamed up the Yangtse to Hankow, five hundred miles from the sea. There is not much space for such large rivers in peninsular Europe, but the Danube, Rhine, andElbe carry a great traffic in direct connection with the ocean. Mannheim, three hundred miles up the Rhine, was one of the principal ports of Europe before the war; barges a hundred yards long and of a thousand tons burden lay beside its wharves. For the rest, the peninsulation of Europe, which limits the development of rivers, itself offers even greater facilities for mobility by water. The similarity of these two "Coastlands" is not limited to the navigability of their rivers. If we clear away from the more arid zone on thc rainfall map of the World-Island the patches indicative of merely local rains, due to mountain groups, we perceive at once the preemi- nence of the coastlands in fertility, owing to their widespread rainfall on the plains as well as in the mountains. The monsoon winds of the summer carry the moisture of the ocean from the southwest on to India and from the southeast on to China; the west winds from the Atlantic bring rain at all seasons upon Europe, and in the winter-time upon the Mediterranean. Both coastlands are therefore rich with tillage, and for that reason nourished their great populations. Thus Europe and the Indies are the regions of the plowmen and shipmen; whereas the North- ern Heartland, Arabia, and the Southern Heartland have for the most part been unplowed, and are inaccessible to seagoing ships. On the other hand, they are naturally adapted to the mobility of horsemen and camel-men, with their herds of cattle and flocks of sheep. Even on the savannahs of tropical Africa, where horses and camels are absent, the wealth of the natives is chiefly of cattle and sheep. These are, of course, broad generalizations, with many local exceptions; they are none the less truly and sufficiently descriptive of immense geographical realities. ~ Let us now call history to our aid, for no practical idea, no idea which moves men to action, can be grasped statically; we must come to it with a momentum of thought either from our own experience or from the history of the race. The oases of the East count in poetry as the gardens of the world, only because they are approached over the desert! Recorded history begins in the great oases round the north of Arabia. The first international politics of which we have definite knowledge were concerned with the intercourse between two states which had grown up in the alluvial flats of the Lower Euphrates and Lower Nile; the maintenance of dikes to keep out the water, and of canals to distribute water, inevitably gives an impulse to social order and discipline. There was a certain difference in the two civilizations which may well have been the basis of interchange between them. In Egypt the rocky sides of the relatively narrow valley offered stone for building, and the papyrus reed afforded a material for writing; whereas, building was of brick in the broad plain of Babylonia, and clay tablets bore the cuneiform inscriptions. The road between the two countries ran west- ward from the Euphrates across the Syrian angle of the Arabian Desert, past the wells of Palmyra, to Damascus, which was built in the oasis formed by the streams Abana and Pharpar descending from Anti- Lebanon and Hermon. From Damascus there were alternative ways into Egypt; the lower by the coast, and the upper along the edge of the desert plateau east of the Jordan Valley. Aloof, on the rocky ridge of Judea, between these upper and lower ways, was the hill fortress of Jerusalem. In a monkish map, contemporary with the Crusades, which still hangs in Hereford Cathedral, Jerusalem is marked as at the geometrical center, the navel, of the world, and on the floor of the Church of the Holy Sepulchre at Jerusalem they will show you to this day the precise spot which is the center. If our study of the geographical realities, as we now know them in their completeness, is leading us to right conclu- sions, the medieval ecclesiastics were not far wrong. If the World- Island be inevitably the principal seat of humanity on this globe, and if Arabia, as the passage-land from Europe to the Indies and from the Northern to the Southern Heartland, be central in the World-Island, then the hill citadel of Jerusalem has a strategical position with reference to world-realities not differing essentially from its ideal position in the perspective of the Middle Ages, or its strategical position between ancient Babylon and Egypt. As the war has shown, the Suez Canal carries the rich traffic between the Indies and Europe to within striking distance of an army based on Palestine, and already the trunk railway is being built through the coastal plain by Jaffa, which will connect the Southern with the Northern Heartland. Who owns Damascus, moreover, will have flank access to the alternative route between the oceans down the Euphrates Valley. It cannot be wholly a coincidence that in the selfsame region should be the starting point of history and the crossing point of the most vital of modem highways. In the dawn of history we find the children of Shem, the Semites, conquering the cultivated margins of the Arabian deserts; there is no small similarity between the ring of their settlements round the sea of sand, and the settlements of the Greeks round the Aegean Sea. The invasion of the Promised Land from beyond the Jordan by the Beni- Irael, the Children of Israel, was probably but one of many like descents of the Bedouin. The Chaldees, from whose city of Ur on the desert border Abraham migrated along the beaten track into Palestine, were Semites who supplanted the non-Semitic Accadians in the land which became Babylonia; and the dynasty of the Shepherd Kings in Egypt was also apparently of Semitic origin. So it came about that all the peoples of Arabia Arabs, Babylonians, Assyrians, Syrians, Phoeni- cians, and Hebrews spoke dialects of the same Semitic family of speech. To-day Arabic is the universal tongue from the Taurus to the Gulf of Aden, and from the Persian Mountains to the oases in the Sahara west of the Nile. The Arabian tableland drops steeply to the sea shores around in all directions save one; northeastward in shelves gradually down to the depression occupied by the Euphrates and the Persian Gulf. That depres- sion is eighteen hundred miles long, from the gorge by which the Euphrates issues from its source valley in the Armenian Plateau to the Strait of Ormuz at the mouth of the Persian Gulf; throughout its length it is overlooked by the range of the Persian Mountains, the high Iranian brink of the Heartland. One of the great events of classical history was when the Persian Highlanders came down on to the Euphrates plain under their King Cyrus, and, after conquering Babylon, passed on by the Syrian road through Damascus to the conquest of Egypt. The gorge by which the Euphrates escapes from the Armenian Up- land is more than eight hundred miles in a direct line from the river mouth and only a little more than one hundred miles from the northeast- ern comer of the Mediterranean Sea near Aleppo. Immediately west of this gorge the high upland of Armenia, some one and a half miles in average elevation, drops to the much lower peninsular tableland of Asia Minor. A second great event in classical history was when the Macedonians, under King Alexander, having crossed the Dardanelles and traversed the open center of Asia Minor, descended by the Taurus passes into Cilicia, and struck through Syria into Egypt, and then from Egypt back through Syria to the Euphrates, and down the Euphrates to Babylon. It is true that Alexander thus led his Macedonians overland into Arabia, but their attack was really based on sea-power, as is evident from the rapid rise which ensued of the great Greek-speaking ports of Alexandria and Antioch, the coastal capitals, that is to say, of seamen going inland. If these facts be considered with a geographical eye, a belt of fertility will be seen extending northwestward up the Euphrates, then curving to southward along the rain-gathering mountains of Syria, and ending westward in Egypt. It is a populous belt, for it is inhabited by the settled plowmen. Except for two intervals of sterility, the trunk road of antiquity ran through its corn fields from Babylon to Memphis. The key to some of the greater events of ancient history is to be found in the subjection of the peoples of this agricultural strip now to this and now to that neighboring race of superior mobility. From the south, with all the depth of Arabia behind them, the camel-men advanced northeastward against Mesopotamia, northwestward against Syria, and westward against Egypt; from the northeast, with all the vast depth of the Heartland behind them, the horsemen came down from the Iranian Upland into Mesopotamia; and from the northwest, whether across the peninsula of Asia Minor or directly to the Levantine shore, came the shipmen against Syria and Egypt, having behind them all the water- ways of Europe? In Asia the Romans did but take over the westward portion of the Macedonian conquests. As the Rhine and Danube, defended by the Legions, marked the extent of Roman penetration northward from the Mediterranean, so the Upper Euphrates, where it flows from north to south before bending southeastward, marked the limit, defended by other Legions, of their eastward penetration from the Mediterranean. The Roman Empire was, in fact, in the large sense, a local empire; it belonged wholly to the Atlantic Coastland. The further provinces which had been under the Macedonian sway fell in Roman times to the Parthians, successors of the Persians, who in their turn descended from Iran upon Mesopotamia. Once more came the opportunity of the camel-men. Inspired by the preaching of Mohammed, the Arabs of the central oasis of Nejd, and of its western extension in the Hedjaz of Mecca and Medina, sent forth the Saracen armies, who drove the Parthians from Mesopotamia, and the Romans from Syria and Egypt, and established a chain of inland capitals--Cairo, Damascus, and Bagdad---in the ancient trackway of fertility. From this fertile base the Saracen power was carried into all the regions around in such manner as to make a bid for a true world- empire. Northeastward the Mohammedans ascended from Bagdad into Iran by the same passway which had guided the Parthians and Persians downward, and they spread even into Northern India. Southward they crossed from the Yemen headland of Arabia to the African coast south of the Sahara, and penetrated on their camels and horses through the whole breadth of the Sudan. Thus, like a vast eagle, their empire of land-power spread its wings from the Arabian Centerland, on the one hand over the Northern Heartland, far into the depths of Asia, and on the other hand over the Southern Heartland equally far into the depths of Africa. But the Saracens were not content with a dominion based only on the means of mobility proper to their steppes and deserts; like their predecessors, the Phoenicians and Shebans, they took to the sea. West- ward they traveled along the north coast of Africa, both on sea and land, until they came to two countries, Barbary and Spain, whose broad tablelands, neither utterly sterile like the Sahara, nor yet forested like most of the European peninsula, repeated in some degree the conditions of their own homeland. On the other hand, eastward from Yemen, at the mouth of the Red Sea, and from Oman, at the mouth of the Persian Gulf, they sailed on the summer monsoon to the Malabar coast of India, and even to the far Malay Islands, and returned home on the winter monsoon. Thus the Arab dhows sketched out a sea-empire, extending from the Straits of Gibraltar to the Straits of Malacca, from the Atlantic gate to the Pacific gate. This vast Saracen design of a northward and southward dominion of camel-men crossed by a westward and eastward dominion ofshipmen was vitiated by one fatal defect; it lacked in its Arabian base the necessary man-power to make it good. But no student of the realities, about which must turn the strategical thought of any government aspir- ing to world-power, can aftbrd to lose sight of the warning thus given by history.
The Saracen Empire was overthrown, not from Europe or the Indies, but fi'om the Heartland in the north--a significant fact. Arabia is sea- girt or desert-girt in every other direction but towards the Heartland. The western sea-power of the Arabs was no doubt countered from Venice and Genoa, and their eastern sea-power was subdued by the Portuguese after they had rounded the Cape of Good Hope, but the downfall of the Saracens in Arabia itself was due to Turkish land- power. We must give some further consideration to the characteristics of the great Northern Heartland, and in the first place to those of the long grassy zone which, south of the forest zone, extends across its whole breadth overlapping westward and eastward some distance into the adjoining parts of the two Coastlands. The steppes begin in the center of Europe, where the Hungarian Plain is completely surrounded by a ring of forested mountains, the Eastern Alps and the Carpathians. ~ To-day fields of wheat and maize have in large part replaced the native grass, but a hundred years ago, before the railways had brought markets within reach, the sea-like levels of Hungary east of the Danube were a prairie land, and the wealth of the Hungarians was almost exclusively in horses and cattle. Beyond the forested barrier of the Carpathians begin the steppes of the main belt, spreading eastward, with the shore of the Black Sea to the south and the edge of the Russian forest to the north. The forest edge crosses the Russian Plain sinuously, but in a generally oblique direction, from the northern end of the Carpathians in the fiftieth parallel of latitude to the foot of the Ural range in the fifty-sixth parallel. Moscow stands a short way within the forest, where are the broad clearings which constituted all of inhabited Russia until the recent colonization of the steppe southward. As far as the Volga and the Don the wheat fields have now in large measure replaced the steppe grass, but until a hundred years ago the Cossack outposts of Russia were still based on the Dnieper and Don Rivers, the trees along whose banks alone broke the vast levels of waving grass or of snow. The forests which clothe the end of the Ural Mountains form a promontory southward into the open steppes, but the grass is continuous through the gateway of plain which leads from Europe into Asia between the Ural range and the northern end of the Caspian Sea. Beyond this gateway the steppes expand again to even greater breadth than in Europe. To the north of them are still the forests, but to the south are now the deserts and sub-arid steppes of Turkestan. The Trans-Siberian railway traverses the grassy zone from Chelyabinsk, the station at the eastern foot of the Ural Mountains where the lines from Petrograd and Moscow unite, to Irkutsk on the Angara River just below its exit from Lake Baikal. Wheat fields are beginning in large measure to replace the grass along the line of the railway, but the thread of settled population is still a narrow one, and the Tartar and Khirghiz horsemen are still nomad over wide areas. The edge of the forest bends southward along the boundary between Western and Eastern Siberia, for Eastern Siberia is filled with forested mountains and hills, which fall in elevation gradually from the Transbai- kalian Plateau into the northeastern promontory of Asia towards Bering Strait. The grassy zone bends south with the forest and continues eastward over the lower level of the Mongolian Upland. The slope upward from the Great Lowland into Mongolia is through the "Dry Strait" of Zungaria, between the Tianshan Mountains on the south and Altai Mountains on the north. Beyond Zungaria the steppes, now at upland level, continue round the southern edge of the forested Altai and Transbaikalian Mountains, with the Gobi Desert to the south of them, until they reach the upper tributaries of the Amur River.
There is a forest belt along the eastern, outward face of the Kingan range, by which the Mongolian upland drops to the lowland of Manchuria, but there is a last detached grassland in Manchuria, to be compared with the similarly detached grassland of Hungary five thousand miles away at the west end of the steppe belt. Grassy Manchuria does not, however, extend through to the Pacific shore, for there a coast range of mountains, thickly lbrested, enframes the open country and deflects the eastward-flowing Amur to a northward mouth. Let us clear this long ribbon of steppes of its modern railways and corn fields, and people it again in imagination with horse-riding Tartars, who are none other than Turks; it is said that the Turkish language of Constantinople can to this day be understood by the Arctic tribe at the mouth of the Lena River. For some recurrent reasow--it may have been owing to spells of droughty years---these Tartar mobile hordes have from time to time in the course of history gathered their whole strength together and fallen like a devastating avalanche upon the settled agricul- tural peoples either of China or Europe. In the West we hear of them first as the Huns, who in the middle of the fifth century after Christ rode THE LANDSMAN'S POINT OF VIEW o. FI6. 22.--Forest and steppes in East Europe. (After a diagram in ray paper on "The Geographical Pivot of History" in the Geographical Journal for 19o4. ) into Hungary under a great but terrible leader, Attila. From Hungary they raided in three directions--northwestward, westward, and southwest- ward. Northwestward they caused so much commotion among the Germans, that those tribes nearest the sea, the Angles and Saxons, were in part driven over the water to a new home in the island of Britain. Westward they penetrated far into Gaul, but were defeated in the great battle of Chalons, where the Frank, the Goth, and the Roman Provincial, standing shoulder to shoulder against the common enemy from the east, began that fusion from which has sprung the modem French people. Southwestward Attila advanced as far as Milan, destroying on the way the important Roman cities of Aquileia and Padua, whose inhabitants fled to the lagoons by the sea and there founded Venice. At Milan Attila was met by Bishop Leo of Rome, and, for whatever reason, went no further, with the result that the Roman See won a great prestige. Thus can it be said with much truth that from the reaction of the coastmen against this hammer blow from the Heartland, there arose the English and French nationalities, the sea-power of Venice, and the supreme medieval institution of the Papacy. Who shall say what great and, let us hope, beneficent things may not grow out of the reaction which has been compelled by the hammer blow of our modem Huns? The Hunnish raids ceased after a few years, for it is probable that the man-power behind them was not very considerable; the force of a blow may be due as much to its speed as to its weight. But some Hunnish remnants probably lingered in the grassy vacancy of the Hun- garian Plain, to be absorbed by new tribes of horsemen advancing westward, the Avars, against whom Charlemagne made war, and pres- ently the Magyars. In the year 1000 these Magyar Turks, who had done much ravaging in Germany during the previous century, were converted to Christianity from Rome, and became thenceforth some sort of a bulwark to Latin Christendom, so that no more Tartars were admitted into Hungary. But the economic life of the Magyars continued in the main to be that of the steppes until less than a hundred years ago. When we reflect that through several centuries of the Dark Ages the Norse pagans in their ships were at piracy on the Northern seas, and the Saracen and Moorish infidels in their ships at piracy on the Mediterranean, and that the horse-riding Turks from Asia raided thus into the very heart of the Christian peninsula when it was clasped by hostile sea-power, we have some idea of the pounding, as between pestle and mortar, which went into the making of modem Europe. The pestle was land-power from the Heartland.